PS(1)                            User Commands                            PS(1)

NAME
       ps - report a snapshot of the current processes.

SYNOPSIS
       ps [options]

DESCRIPTION
       ps displays information about a selection of the active processes.  If
       you want a repetitive update of the selection and the displayed
       information, use top instead.

       This version of ps accepts several kinds of options:

       1   UNIX options, which may be grouped and must be preceded by a dash.
       2   BSD options, which may be grouped and must not be used with a dash.
       3   GNU long options, which are preceded by two dashes.

       Options of different types may be freely mixed, but conflicts can
       appear.  There are some synonymous options, which are functionally
       identical, due to the many standards and ps implementations that this ps
       is compatible with.

       Note that ps -aux is distinct from ps aux.  The POSIX and UNIX standards
       require that ps -aux print all processes owned by a user named x, as
       well as printing all processes that would be selected by the -a option.
       If the user named x does not exist, this ps may interpret the command as
       ps aux instead and print a warning.  This behavior is intended to aid in
       transitioning old scripts and habits.  It is fragile, subject to change,
       and thus should not be relied upon.

       By default, ps selects all processes with the same effective user ID
       (euid=EUID) as the current user and associated with the same terminal as
       the invoker.  It displays the process ID (pid=PID), the terminal
       associated with the process (tname=TTY), the cumulated CPU time in
       [DD-]hh:mm:ss format (time=TIME), and the executable name (ucmd=CMD).
       Output is unsorted by default.

       The use of BSD-style options will add process state (stat=STAT) to the
       default display and show the command args (args=COMMAND) instead of the
       executable name.  You can override this with the PS_FORMAT environment
       variable.  The use of BSD-style options will also change the process
       selection to include processes on other terminals (TTYs) that are owned
       by you; alternately, this may be described as setting the selection to
       be the set of all processes filtered to exclude processes owned by other
       users or not on a terminal.  These effects are not considered when
       options are described as being "identical" below, so -M will be
       considered identical to Z and so on.

       Except as described below, process selection options are additive.  The
       default selection is discarded, and then the selected processes are
       added to the set of processes to be displayed.  A process will thus be
       shown if it meets any of the given selection criteria.

EXAMPLES
       To see every process on the system using standard syntax:
          ps -e
          ps -ef
          ps -eF
          ps -ely

       To see every process on the system using BSD syntax:
          ps ax
          ps axu

       To print a process tree:
          ps -ejH
          ps axjf

       To get info about threads:
          ps -eLf
          ps axms

       To get security info:
          ps -eo euser,ruser,suser,fuser,f,comm,label
          ps axZ
          ps -eM

       To see every process running as root (real & effective ID) in user
       format:
          ps -U root -u root u

       To see every process with a user-defined format:
          ps -eo pid,tid,class,rtprio,ni,pri,psr,pcpu,stat,wchan:14,comm
          ps axo stat,euid,ruid,tty,tpgid,sess,pgrp,ppid,pid,pcpu,comm
          ps -Ao pid,tt,user,fname,tmout,f,wchan

       Print only the process IDs of syslogd:
          ps -C syslogd -o pid=

       Print only the name of PID 42:
          ps -q 42 -o comm=

SIMPLE PROCESS SELECTION
       a      Lift the BSD-style "only yourself" restriction, which is imposed
              upon the set of all processes when some BSD-style (without "-")
              options are used or when the ps personality setting is BSD-like.
              The set of processes selected in this manner is in addition to
              the set of processes selected by other means.  An alternate
              description is that this option causes ps to list all processes
              with a terminal (tty), or to list all processes when used
              together with the x option.

       -A     Select all processes.  Identical to -e.

       -a     Select all processes except both session leaders (see getsid(2))
              and processes not associated with a terminal.

       -d     Select all processes except session leaders.

       --deselect
              Select all processes except those that fulfill the specified
              conditions (negates the selection).  Identical to -N.

       -e     Select all processes.  Identical to -A.

       g      Really all, even session leaders.  This flag is obsolete and may
              be discontinued in a future release.  It is normally implied by
              the a flag, and is only useful when operating in the sunos4
              personality.

       -N     Select all processes except those that fulfill the specified
              conditions (negates the selection).  Identical to --deselect.

       T      Select all processes associated with this terminal.  Identical to
              the t option without any argument.

       r      Restrict the selection to only running processes.

       x      Lift the BSD-style "must have a tty" restriction, which is
              imposed upon the set of all processes when some BSD-style
              (without "-") options are used or when the ps personality setting
              is BSD-like.  The set of processes selected in this manner is in
              addition to the set of processes selected by other means.  An
              alternate description is that this option causes ps to list all
              processes owned by you (same EUID as ps), or to list all
              processes when used together with the a option.

PROCESS SELECTION BY LIST
       These options accept a single argument in the form of a blank-separated
       or comma-separated list.  They can be used multiple times.  For example:
       ps -p "1 2" -p 3,4

       -123   Identical to --pid 123.

       123    Identical to --pid 123.

       -C cmdlist
              Select by command name.  This selects the processes whose
              executable name is given in cmdlist.  NOTE: The command name is
              not the same as the command line. Previous versions of procps and
              the kernel truncated this command name to 15 characters. This
              limitation is no longer present in both. If you depended on
              matching only 15 characters, you may no longer get a match.

       -G grplist
              Select by real group ID (RGID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose real group name or ID is in the grplist list.
              The real group ID identifies the group of the user who created
              the process, see getgid(2).

       -g grplist
              Select by session OR by effective group name.  Selection by
              session is specified by many standards, but selection by
              effective group is the logical behavior that several other
              operating systems use.  This ps will select by session when the
              list is completely numeric (as sessions are).  Group ID numbers
              will work only when some group names are also specified.  See the
              -s and --group options.

       --Group grplist
              Select by real group ID (RGID) or name.  Identical to -G.

       --group grplist
              Select by effective group ID (EGID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose effective group name or ID is in grplist.  The
              effective group ID describes the group whose file access
              permissions are used by the process (see getegid(2)).  The -g
              option is often an alternative to --group.

       p pidlist
              Select by process ID.  Identical to -p and --pid.

       -p pidlist
              Select by PID.  This selects the processes whose process ID
              numbers appear in pidlist.  Identical to p and --pid.

       --pid pidlist
              Select by process ID.  Identical to -p and p.

       --ppid pidlist
              Select by parent process ID.  This selects the processes with a
              parent process ID in pidlist.  That is, it selects processes that
              are children of those listed in pidlist.

       q pidlist
              Select by process ID (quick mode).  Identical to -q and
              --quick-pid.

       -q pidlist
              Select by PID (quick mode).  This selects the processes whose
              process ID numbers appear in pidlist.  With this option ps reads
              the necessary info only for the pids listed in the pidlist and
              doesn't apply additional filtering rules.  The order of pids is
              unsorted and preserved.  No additional selection options, sorting
              and forest type listings are allowed in this mode.  Identical to
              q and --quick-pid.

       --quick-pid pidlist
              Select by process ID (quick mode).  Identical to -q and q.

       -s sesslist
              Select by session ID.  This selects the processes with a session
              ID specified in sesslist.

       --sid sesslist
              Select by session ID.  Identical to -s.

       t ttylist
              Select by tty.  Nearly identical to -t and --tty, but can also be
              used with an empty ttylist to indicate the terminal associated
              with ps.  Using the T option is considered cleaner than using t
              with an empty ttylist.

       -t ttylist
              Select by tty.  This selects the processes associated with the
              terminals given in ttylist.  Terminals (ttys, or screens for text
              output) can be specified in several forms: /dev/ttyS1, ttyS1, S1.
              A plain "-" may be used to select processes not attached to any
              terminal.

       --tty ttylist
              Select by terminal.  Identical to -t and t.

       U userlist
              Select by effective user ID (EUID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose effective user name or ID is in userlist.  The
              effective user ID describes the user whose file access
              permissions are used by the process (see geteuid(2)).  Identical
              to -u and --user.

       -U userlist
              Select by real user ID (RUID) or name.  It selects the processes
              whose real user name or ID is in the userlist list.  The real
              user ID identifies the user who created the process, see
              getuid(2).

       -u userlist
              Select by effective user ID (EUID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose effective user name or ID is in userlist.

              The effective user ID describes the user whose file access
              permissions are used by the process (see geteuid(2)).  Identical
              to U and --user.

       --User userlist
              Select by real user ID (RUID) or name.  Identical to -U.

       --user userlist
              Select by effective user ID (EUID) or name.  Identical to -u and
              U.

OUTPUT FORMAT CONTROL
       These options are used to choose the information displayed by ps.  The
       output may differ by personality.

       -c     Show different scheduler information for the -l option.

       --context
              Display security context format (for SELinux).

       -f     Do full-format listing.  This option can be combined with many
              other UNIX-style options to add additional columns.  It also
              causes the command arguments to be printed.  When used with -L,
              the NLWP (number of threads) and LWP (thread ID) columns will be
              added.  See the c option, the format keyword args, and the format
              keyword comm.

       -F     Extra full format.  See the -f option, which -F implies.

       --format format
              user-defined format.  Identical to -o and o.

       j      BSD job control format.

       -j     Jobs format.

       l      Display BSD long format.

       -l     Long format.  The -y option is often useful with this.

       -M     Add a column of security data.  Identical to Z (for SELinux).

       O format
              is preloaded o (overloaded).  The BSD O option can act like -O
              (user-defined output format with some common fields predefined)
              or can be used to specify sort order.  Heuristics are used to
              determine the behavior of this option.  To ensure that the
              desired behavior is obtained (sorting or formatting), specify the
              option in some other way (e.g.  with -O or --sort).  When used as
              a formatting option, it is identical to -O, with the BSD
              personality.

       -O format
              Like -o, but preloaded with some default columns.  Identical to
              -o pid,format,state,tname,time,command or -o pid,format,tname,
              time,cmd, see -o below.

       o format
              Specify user-defined format.  Identical to -o and --format.

       -o format
              User-defined format.  format is a single argument in the form of
              a blank-separated or comma-separated list, which offers a way to
              specify individual output columns.  The recognized keywords are
              described in the STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section below.
              Headers may be renamed (ps -o pid,ruser=RealUser -o comm=Command)
              as desired.  If all column headers are empty (ps -o pid= -o
              comm=) then the header line will not be output.  Column width
              will increase as needed for wide headers; this may be used to
              widen up columns such as WCHAN (ps -o pid,wchan=WIDE-WCHAN-COLUMN
              -o comm).  Explicit width control (ps opid,wchan:42,cmd) is
              offered too.  The behavior of ps -o pid=X,comm=Y varies with
              personality; output may be one column named "X,comm=Y" or two
              columns named "X" and "Y".  Use multiple -o options when in
              doubt.  Use the PS_FORMAT environment variable to specify a
              default as desired; DefSysV and DefBSD are macros that may be
              used to choose the default UNIX or BSD columns.

       s      Display signal format.

       u      Display user-oriented format.

       v      Display virtual memory format.

       X      Register format.

       -y     Do not show flags; show rss in place of addr.  This option can
              only be used with -l.

       Z      Add a column of security data.  Identical to -M (for SELinux).

OUTPUT MODIFIERS
       c      Show the true command name.  This is derived from the name of the
              executable file, rather than from the argv value.  Command
              arguments and any modifications to them are thus not shown.  This
              option effectively turns the args format keyword into the comm
              format keyword; it is useful with the -f format option and with
              the various BSD-style format options, which all normally display
              the command arguments.  See the -f option, the format keyword
              args, and the format keyword comm.

       --cols n
              Set screen width.

       --columns n
              Set screen width.

       --cumulative
              Include some dead child process data (as a sum with the parent).

       e      Show the environment after the command.

       f      ASCII art process hierarchy (forest).

       --forest
              ASCII art process tree.

       h      No header.  (or, one header per screen in the BSD personality).
              The h option is problematic.  Standard BSD ps uses this option to
              print a header on each page of output, but older Linux ps uses
              this option to totally disable the header.  This version of ps
              follows the Linux usage of not printing the header unless the BSD
              personality has been selected, in which case it prints a header
              on each page of output.  Regardless of the current personality,
              you can use the long options --headers and --no-headers to enable
              printing headers each page or disable headers entirely,
              respectively.

       -H     Show process hierarchy (forest).

       --headers
              Repeat header lines, one per page of output.

       k spec Specify sorting order.  Sorting syntax is
              [+|-]key[,[+|-]key[,...]].  Choose a multi-letter key from the
              STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section.  The "+" is optional since
              default direction is increasing numerical or lexicographic order.
              Identical to --sort.

                      Examples:
                      ps jaxkuid,-ppid,+pid
                      ps axk comm o comm,args
                      ps kstart_time -ef

       --lines n
              Set screen height.

       n      Numeric output for WCHAN and USER (including all types of UID and
              GID).

       --no-headers
              Print no header line at all.  --no-heading is an alias for this
              option.

       O order
              Sorting order (overloaded).  The BSD O option can act like -O
              (user-defined output format with some common fields predefined)
              or can be used to specify sort order.  Heuristics are used to
              determine the behavior of this option.  To ensure that the
              desired behavior is obtained (sorting or formatting), specify the
              option in some other way (e.g.  with -O or --sort).

              For sorting, obsolete BSD O option syntax is
              O[+|-]k1[,[+|-]k2[,...]].  It orders the processes listing
              according to the multilevel sort specified by the sequence of
              one-letter short keys k1,k2, ... described in the OBSOLETE SORT
              KEYS section below.  The "+" is currently optional, merely
              re-iterating the default direction on a key, but may help to
              distinguish an O sort from an O format.  The "-" reverses
              direction only on the key it precedes.

       --rows n
              Set screen height.

       S      Sum up some information, such as CPU usage, from dead child
              processes into their parent.  This is useful for examining a
              system where a parent process repeatedly forks off short-lived
              children to do work.

       --sort spec
              Specify sorting order.  Sorting syntax is
              [+|-]key[,[+|-]key[,...]].  Choose a multi-letter key from the
              STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section.  The "+" is optional since
              default direction is increasing numerical or lexicographic order.
              Identical to k.  For example: ps jax --sort=uid,-ppid,+pid

       w      Wide output.  Use this option twice for unlimited width.

       -w     Wide output.  Use this option twice for unlimited width.

       --width n
              Set screen width.

THREAD DISPLAY
       H      Show threads as if they were processes.

       -L     Show threads, possibly with LWP and NLWP columns.

       m      Show threads after processes.

       -m     Show threads after processes.

       -T     Show threads, possibly with SPID column.

OTHER INFORMATION
       --help section
              Print a help message.  The section argument can be one of simple,
              list, output, threads, misc, or all.  The argument can be
              shortened to one of the underlined letters as in: s|l|o|t|m|a.

       --info Print debugging info.

       L      List all format specifiers.

       V      Print the procps-ng version.

       -V     Print the procps-ng version.

       --version
              Print the procps-ng version.

NOTES
       This ps works by reading the virtual files in /proc.  This ps does not
       need to be setuid kmem or have any privileges to run.  Do not give this
       ps any special permissions.

       CPU usage is currently expressed as the percentage of time spent running
       during the entire lifetime of a process.  This is not ideal, and it does
       not conform to the standards that ps otherwise conforms to.  CPU usage
       is unlikely to add up to exactly 100%.

       The SIZE and RSS fields don't count some parts of a process including
       the page tables, kernel stack, struct thread_info, and struct
       task_struct.  This is usually at least 20 KiB of memory that is always
       resident.  SIZE is the virtual size of the process (code+data+stack).

       Processes marked <defunct> are dead processes (so-called "zombies") that
       remain because their parent has not destroyed them properly.  These
       processes will be destroyed by init(8) if the parent process exits.

       If the length of the username is greater than the length of the display
       column, the username will be truncated.  See the -o and -O formatting
       options to customize length.

       Commands options such as ps -aux are not recommended as it is a
       confusion of two different standards.  According to the POSIX and UNIX
       standards, the above command asks to display all processes with a TTY
       (generally the commands users are running) plus all processes owned by a
       user named x.  If that user doesn't exist, then ps will assume you
       really meant ps aux.

PROCESS FLAGS
       The sum of these values is displayed in the "F" column, which is
       provided by the flags output specifier:

               1    forked but didn't exec
               4    used super-user privileges

PROCESS STATE CODES
       Here are the different values that the s, stat and state output
       specifiers (header "STAT" or "S") will display to describe the state of
       a process:

               D    uninterruptible sleep (usually IO)
               I    Idle kernel thread
               R    running or runnable (on run queue)
               S    interruptible sleep (waiting for an event to complete)
               T    stopped by job control signal
               t    stopped by debugger during the tracing
               W    paging (not valid since the 2.6.xx kernel)
               X    dead (should never be seen)
               Z    defunct ("zombie") process, terminated but not reaped by
                    its parent

       For BSD formats and when the stat keyword is used, additional characters
       may be displayed:

               <    high-priority (not nice to other users)
               N    low-priority (nice to other users)
               L    has pages locked into memory (for real-time and custom IO)
               s    is a session leader
               l    is multi-threaded (using CLONE_THREAD, like NPTL pthreads
                    do)
               +    is in the foreground process group

OBSOLETE SORT KEYS
       These keys are used by the BSD O option (when it is used for sorting).
       The GNU --sort option doesn't use these keys, but the specifiers
       described below in the STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section.  Note that
       the values used in sorting are the internal values ps uses and not the
       "cooked" values used in some of the output format fields (e.g.  sorting
       on tty will sort into device number, not according to the terminal name
       displayed).  Pipe ps output into the sort(1) command if you want to sort
       the cooked values.

       KEY   LONG         DESCRIPTION
       c     cmd          simple name of executable
       C     pcpu         cpu utilization
       f     flags        flags as in long format F field
       g     pgrp         process group ID
       G     tpgid        controlling tty process group ID
       j     cutime       cumulative user time
       J     cstime       cumulative system time
       k     utime        user time
       m     min_flt      number of minor page faults
       M     maj_flt      number of major page faults
       n     cmin_flt     cumulative minor page faults
       N     cmaj_flt     cumulative major page faults
       o     session      session ID
       p     pid          process ID
       P     ppid         parent process ID
       r     rss          resident set size
       R     resident     resident pages
       s     size         memory size in kilobytes
       S     share        amount of shared pages
       t     tty          the device number of the controlling tty
       T     start_time   time process was started
       U     uid          user ID number
       u     user         user name
       v     vsize        total VM size in KiB
       y     priority     kernel scheduling priority

AIX FORMAT DESCRIPTORS
       This ps supports AIX format descriptors, which work somewhat like the
       formatting codes of printf(1) and printf(3).  For example, the normal
       default output can be produced with this: ps -eo "%p %y %x %c".  The
       NORMAL codes are described in the next section.

       CODE   NORMAL   HEADER
       %C     pcpu     %CPU
       %G     group    GROUP
       %P     ppid     PPID
       %U     user     USER
       %a     args     COMMAND
       %c     comm     COMMAND
       %g     rgroup   RGROUP
       %n     nice     NI
       %p     pid      PID
       %r     pgid     PGID
       %t     etime    ELAPSED
       %u     ruser    RUSER
       %x     time     TIME
       %y     tty      TTY
       %z     vsz      VSZ

STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS
       Here are the different keywords that may be used to control the output
       format (e.g., with option -o) or to sort the selected processes with the
       GNU-style --sort option.

       For example: ps -eo pid,user,args --sort user

       This version of ps tries to recognize most of the keywords used in other
       implementations of ps.

       The following user-defined format specifiers may contain spaces: args,
       cmd, comm, command, fname, ucmd, ucomm, lstart, bsdstart, start.

       Some keywords may not be available for sorting.

       CODE        HEADER    DESCRIPTION

       %cpu        %CPU      cpu utilization of the process in "##.#" format.
                             Currently, it is the CPU time used divided by the
                             time the process has been running
                             (cputime/realtime ratio), expressed as a
                             percentage.  It will not add up to 100% unless you
                             are lucky.  (alias pcpu).

       %mem        %MEM      ratio of the process's resident set size  to the
                             physical memory on the machine, expressed as a
                             percentage.  (alias pmem).

       args        COMMAND   command with all its arguments as a string.
                             Modifications to the arguments may be shown.  The
                             output in this column may contain spaces.  A
                             process marked <defunct> is partly dead, waiting
                             to be fully destroyed by its parent.  Sometimes
                             the process args will be unavailable; when this
                             happens, ps will instead print the executable name
                             in brackets.  (alias cmd, command).  See also the
                             comm format keyword, the -f option, and the c
                             option.
                             When specified last, this column will extend to
                             the edge of the display.  If ps can not determine
                             display width, as when output is redirected
                             (piped) into a file or another command, the output
                             width is undefined (it may be 80, unlimited,
                             determined by the TERM variable, and so on).  The
                             COLUMNS environment variable or --cols option may
                             be used to exactly determine the width in this
                             case.  The w or -w option may be also be used to
                             adjust width.

       blocked     BLOCKED   mask of the blocked signals, see signal(7).
                             According to the width of the field, a 32 or
                             64-bit mask in hexadecimal format is displayed.
                             (alias sig_block, sigmask).

       bsdstart    START     time the command started.  If the process was
                             started less than 24 hours ago, the output format
                             is " HH:MM", else it is " Mmm:SS" (where Mmm is
                             the three letters of the month).  See also lstart,
                             start, start_time, and stime.

       bsdtime     TIME      accumulated cpu time, user + system.  The display
                             format is usually "MMM:SS", but can be shifted to
                             the right if the process used more than 999
                             minutes of cpu time.

       c           C         processor utilization.  Currently, this is the
                             integer value of the percent usage over the
                             lifetime of the process.  (see %cpu).

       caught      CAUGHT    mask of the caught signals, see signal(7).
                             According to the width of the field, a 32 or 64
                             bits mask in hexadecimal format is displayed.
                             (alias sig_catch, sigcatch).

       cgname      CGNAME    display name of control groups to which the
                             process belongs.

       cgroup      CGROUP    display control groups to which the process
                             belongs.

       class       CLS       scheduling class of the process.  (alias policy,
                             cls).  Field's possible values are:

                                      -   not reported
                                      TS  SCHED_OTHER
                                      FF  SCHED_FIFO
                                      RR  SCHED_RR
                                      B   SCHED_BATCH
                                      ISO SCHED_ISO
                                      IDL SCHED_IDLE
                                      DLN SCHED_DEADLINE
                                      ?   unknown value

       cls         CLS       scheduling class of the process.  (alias policy,
                             cls).  Field's possible values are:

                                      -   not reported
                                      TS  SCHED_OTHER
                                      FF  SCHED_FIFO
                                      RR  SCHED_RR
                                      B   SCHED_BATCH
                                      ISO SCHED_ISO
                                      IDL SCHED_IDLE
                                      DLN SCHED_DEADLINE
                                      ?   unknown value

       cmd         CMD       see args.  (alias args, command).

       comm        COMMAND   command name (only the executable name).
                             Modifications to the command name will not be
                             shown.  A process marked <defunct> is partly dead,
                             waiting to be fully destroyed by its parent.  The
                             output in this column may contain spaces.  (alias
                             ucmd, ucomm).  See also the args format keyword,
                             the -f option, and the c option.
                             When specified last, this column will extend to
                             the edge of the display.  If ps can not determine
                             display width, as when output is redirected
                             (piped) into a file or another command, the output
                             width is undefined (it may be 80, unlimited,
                             determined by the TERM variable, and so on).  The
                             COLUMNS environment variable or --cols option may
                             be used to exactly determine the width in this
                             case.  The w or -w option may be also be used to
                             adjust width.

       command     COMMAND   See args.  (alias args, command).

       cp          CP        per-mill (tenths of a percent) CPU usage.  (see
                             %cpu).

       cputime     TIME      cumulative CPU time, "[DD-]hh:mm:ss" format.
                             (alias time).

       cputimes    TIME      cumulative CPU time in seconds (alias times).

       drs         DRS       data resident set size, the amount of physical
                             memory devoted to other than executable code.

       egid        EGID      effective group ID number of the process as a
                             decimal integer.  (alias gid).

       egroup      EGROUP    effective group ID of the process.  This will be
                             the textual group ID, if it can be obtained and
                             the field width permits, or a decimal
                             representation otherwise.  (alias group).

       eip         EIP       instruction pointer.

       esp         ESP       stack pointer.

       etime       ELAPSED   elapsed time since the process was started, in the
                             form [[DD-]hh:]mm:ss.

       etimes      ELAPSED   elapsed time since the process was started, in
                             seconds.

       euid        EUID      effective user ID (alias uid).

       euser       EUSER     effective user name.  This will be the textual
                             user ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.
                             The n option can be used to force the decimal
                             representation.  (alias uname, user).

       exe         EXE       path to the executable. Useful if path cannot be
                             printed via cmd, comm or args format options.

       f           F         flags associated with the process, see the PROCESS
                             FLAGS section.  (alias flag, flags).

       fgid        FGID      filesystem access group ID.  (alias fsgid).

       fgroup      FGROUP    filesystem access group ID.  This will be the
                             textual group ID, if it can be obtained and the
                             field width permits, or a decimal representation
                             otherwise.  (alias fsgroup).

       flag        F         see f.  (alias f, flags).

       flags       F         see f.  (alias f, flag).

       fname       COMMAND   first 8 bytes of the base name of the process's
                             executable file.  The output in this column may
                             contain spaces.

       fuid        FUID      filesystem access user ID.  (alias fsuid).

       fuser       FUSER     filesystem access user ID.  This will be the
                             textual user ID, if it can be obtained and the
                             field width permits, or a decimal representation
                             otherwise.

       gid         GID       see egid.  (alias egid).

       group       GROUP     see egroup.  (alias egroup).

       ignored     IGNORED   mask of the ignored signals, see signal(7).
                             According to the width of the field, a 32 or 64
                             bits mask in hexadecimal format is displayed.
                             (alias sig_ignore, sigignore).

       ipcns       IPCNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       label       LABEL     security label, most commonly used for SELinux
                             context data.  This is for the Mandatory Access
                             Control ("MAC") found on high-security systems.

       lstart      STARTED   time the command started.  See also bsdstart,
                             start, start_time, and stime.

       lsession    SESSION   displays the login session identifier of a
                             process, if systemd support has been included.

       luid        LUID      displays Login ID associated with a process.

       lwp         LWP       light weight process (thread) ID of the
                             dispatchable entity (alias spid, tid).  See tid
                             for additional information.

       lxc         LXC       The name of the lxc container within which a task
                             is running.  If a process is not running inside a
                             container, a dash ('-') will be shown.

       machine     MACHINE   displays the machine name for processes assigned
                             to VM or container, if systemd support has been
                             included.

       maj_flt     MAJFLT    The number of major page faults that have occurred
                             with this process.

       min_flt     MINFLT    The number of minor page faults that have occurred
                             with this process.

       mntns       MNTNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       netns       NETNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       ni          NI        nice value.  This ranges from 19 (nicest) to -20
                             (not nice to others), see nice(1).  (alias nice).

       nice        NI        see ni.(alias ni).

       nlwp        NLWP      number of lwps (threads) in the process.  (alias
                             thcount).

       numa        NUMA      The node associated with the most recently used
                             processor.  A -1 means that NUMA information is
                             unavailable.

       nwchan      WCHAN     address of the kernel function where the process
                             is sleeping (use wchan if you want the kernel
                             function name).  Running tasks will display a dash
                             ('-') in this column.

       ouid        OWNER     displays the Unix user identifier of the owner of
                             the session of a process, if systemd support has
                             been included.

       pcpu        %CPU      see %cpu.  (alias %cpu).

       pending     PENDING   mask of the pending signals.  See signal(7).
                             Signals pending on the process are distinct from
                             signals pending on individual threads.  Use the m
                             option or the -m option to see both.  According to
                             the width of the field, a 32 or 64 bits mask in
                             hexadecimal format is displayed.  (alias sig).

       pgid        PGID      process group ID or, equivalently, the process ID
                             of the process group leader.  (alias pgrp).

       pgrp        PGRP      see pgid.  (alias pgid).

       pid         PID       a number representing the process ID (alias tgid).

       pidns       PIDNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       pmem        %MEM      see %mem.  (alias %mem).

       policy      POL       scheduling class of the process.  (alias class,
                             cls).  Possible values are:

                                      -   not reported
                                      TS  SCHED_OTHER
                                      FF  SCHED_FIFO
                                      RR  SCHED_RR
                                      B   SCHED_BATCH
                                      ISO SCHED_ISO
                                      IDL SCHED_IDLE
                                      DLN SCHED_DEADLINE
                                      ?   unknown value

       ppid        PPID      parent process ID.

       pri         PRI       priority of the process.  Higher number means
                             lower priority.

       psr         PSR       processor that process is currently assigned to.

       rgid        RGID      real group ID.

       rgroup      RGROUP    real group name.  This will be the textual group
                             ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.

       rss         RSS       resident set size, the non-swapped physical memory
                             that a task has used (in kilobytes).  (alias
                             rssize, rsz).

       rssize      RSS       see rss.  (alias rss, rsz).

       rsz         RSZ       see rss.  (alias rss, rssize).

       rtprio      RTPRIO    realtime priority.

       ruid        RUID      real user ID.

       ruser       RUSER     real user ID.  This will be the textual user ID,
                             if it can be obtained and the field width permits,
                             or a decimal representation otherwise.

       s           S         minimal state display (one character).  See
                             section PROCESS STATE CODES for the different
                             values.  See also stat if you want additional
                             information displayed.  (alias state).

       sched       SCH       scheduling policy of the process.  The policies
                             SCHED_OTHER (SCHED_NORMAL), SCHED_FIFO, SCHED_RR,
                             SCHED_BATCH, SCHED_ISO, SCHED_IDLE and
                             SCHED_DEADLINE are respectively displayed as 0, 1,
                             2, 3, 4, 5 and 6.

       seat        SEAT      displays the identifier associated with all
                             hardware devices assigned to a specific workplace,
                             if systemd support has been included.

       sess        SESS      session ID or, equivalently, the process ID of the
                             session leader.  (alias session, sid).

       sgi_p       P         processor that the process is currently executing
                             on.  Displays "*" if the process is not currently
                             running or runnable.

       sgid        SGID      saved group ID.  (alias svgid).

       sgroup      SGROUP    saved group name.  This will be the textual group
                             ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.

       sid         SID       see sess.  (alias sess, session).

       sig         PENDING   see pending.  (alias pending, sig_pend).

       sigcatch    CAUGHT    see caught.  (alias caught, sig_catch).

       sigignore   IGNORED   see ignored.  (alias ignored, sig_ignore).

       sigmask     BLOCKED   see blocked.  (alias blocked, sig_block).

       size        SIZE      approximate amount of swap space that would be
                             required if the process were to dirty all writable
                             pages and then be swapped out.  This number is
                             very rough!

       slice       SLICE     displays the slice unit which a process belongs
                             to, if systemd support has been included.

       spid        SPID      see lwp.  (alias lwp, tid).

       stackp      STACKP    address of the bottom (start) of stack for the
                             process.

       start       STARTED   time the command started.  If the process was
                             started less than 24 hours ago, the output format
                             is "HH:MM:SS", else it is "  Mmm dd" (where Mmm is
                             a three-letter month name).  See also lstart,
                             bsdstart, start_time, and stime.

       start_time  START     starting time or date of the process.  Only the
                             year will be displayed if the process was not
                             started the same year ps was invoked, or "MmmDD"
                             if it was not started the same day, or "HH:MM"
                             otherwise.  See also bsdstart, start, lstart, and
                             stime.

       stat        STAT      multi-character process state.  See section
                             PROCESS STATE CODES for the different values
                             meaning.  See also s and state if you just want
                             the first character displayed.

       state       S         see s. (alias s).

       stime       STIME     see start_time. (alias start_time).

       suid        SUID      saved user ID.  (alias svuid).

       supgid      SUPGID    group ids of supplementary groups, if any.  See
                             getgroups(2).

       supgrp      SUPGRP    group names of supplementary groups, if any.  See
                             getgroups(2).

       suser       SUSER     saved user name.  This will be the textual user
                             ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.
                             (alias svuser).

       svgid       SVGID     see sgid.  (alias sgid).

       svuid       SVUID     see suid.  (alias suid).

       sz          SZ        size in physical pages of the core image of the
                             process.  This includes text, data, and stack
                             space.  Device mappings are currently excluded;
                             this is subject to change.  See vsz and rss.

       tgid        TGID      a number representing the thread group to which a
                             task belongs (alias pid).  It is the process ID of
                             the thread group leader.

       thcount     THCNT     see nlwp.  (alias nlwp).  number of kernel threads
                             owned by the process.

       tid         TID       the unique number representing a dispatchable
                             entity (alias lwp, spid).  This value may also
                             appear as: a process ID (pid); a process group ID
                             (pgrp); a session ID for the session leader (sid);
                             a thread group ID for the thread group leader
                             (tgid); and a tty process group ID for the process
                             group leader (tpgid).

       time        TIME      cumulative CPU time, "[DD-]HH:MM:SS" format.
                             (alias cputime).

       times       TIME      cumulative CPU time in seconds (alias cputimes).

       tname       TTY       controlling tty (terminal).  (alias tt, tty).

       tpgid       TPGID     ID of the foreground process group on the tty
                             (terminal) that the process is connected to, or -1
                             if the process is not connected to a tty.

       trs         TRS       text resident set size, the amount of physical
                             memory devoted to executable code.

       tt          TT        controlling tty (terminal).  (alias tname, tty).

       tty         TT        controlling tty (terminal).  (alias tname, tt).

       ucmd        CMD       see comm.  (alias comm, ucomm).

       ucomm       COMMAND   see comm.  (alias comm, ucmd).

       uid         UID       see euid.  (alias euid).

       uname       USER      see euser.  (alias euser, user).

       unit        UNIT      displays unit which a process belongs to, if
                             systemd support has been included.

       user        USER      see euser.  (alias euser, uname).

       userns      USERNS    Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       utsns       UTSNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       uunit       UUNIT     displays user unit which a process belongs to, if
                             systemd support has been included.

       vsize       VSZ       see vsz.  (alias vsz).

       vsz         VSZ       virtual memory size of the process in KiB
                             (1024-byte units).  Device mappings are currently
                             excluded; this is subject to change.  (alias
                             vsize).

       wchan       WCHAN     name of the kernel function in which the process
                             is sleeping, a "-" if the process is running, or a
                             "*" if the process is multi-threaded and ps is not
                             displaying threads.

ENVIRONMENT VARIABLES
       The following environment variables could affect ps:

       COLUMNS
          Override default display width.

       LINES
          Override default display height.

       PS_PERSONALITY
          Set to one of posix, old, linux, bsd, sun, digital... (see section
          PERSONALITY below).

       CMD_ENV
          Set to one of posix, old, linux, bsd, sun, digital... (see section
          PERSONALITY below).

       I_WANT_A_BROKEN_PS
          Force obsolete command line interpretation.

       LC_TIME
          Date format.

       PS_COLORS
          Not currently supported.

       PS_FORMAT
          Default output format override.  You may set this to a format string
          of the type used for the -o option.  The DefSysV and DefBSD values
          are particularly useful.

       POSIXLY_CORRECT
          Don't find excuses to ignore bad "features".

       POSIX2
          When set to "on", acts as POSIXLY_CORRECT.

       UNIX95
          Don't find excuses to ignore bad "features".

       _XPG
          Cancel CMD_ENV=irix non-standard behavior.

       In general, it is a bad idea to set these variables.  The one exception
       is CMD_ENV or PS_PERSONALITY, which could be set to Linux for normal
       systems.  Without that setting, ps follows the useless and bad parts of
       the Unix98 standard.

PERSONALITY
       390        like the OS/390 OpenEdition ps
       aix        like AIX ps
       bsd        like FreeBSD ps (totally non-standard)
       compaq     like Digital Unix ps
       debian     like the old Debian ps
       digital    like Tru64 (was Digital Unix, was OSF/1) ps
       gnu        like the old Debian ps
       hp         like HP-UX ps
       hpux       like HP-UX ps
       irix       like Irix ps
       linux      ***** recommended *****
       old        like the original Linux ps (totally non-standard)
       os390      like OS/390 Open Edition ps
       posix      standard
       s390       like OS/390 Open Edition ps
       sco        like SCO ps
       sgi        like Irix ps
       solaris2   like Solaris 2+ (SunOS 5) ps
       sunos4     like SunOS 4 (Solaris 1) ps (totally non-standard)
       svr4       standard
       sysv       standard
       tru64      like Tru64 (was Digital Unix, was OSF/1) ps
       unix       standard
       unix95     standard

       unix98     standard

SEE ALSO
       pgrep(1), pstree(1), top(1), proc(5).

STANDARDS
       This ps conforms to:

       1   Version 2 of the Single Unix Specification
       2   The Open Group Technical Standard Base Specifications, Issue 6
       3   IEEE Std 1003.1, 2004 Edition
       4   X/Open System Interfaces Extension [UP XSI]
       5   ISO/IEC 9945:2003

AUTHOR
       ps was originally written by Branko Lankester lankeste@fwi.uva.nl.
       Michael K. Johnson johnsonm@redhat.com re-wrote it significantly to
       use the proc filesystem, changing a few things in the process.  Michael
       Shields mjshield@nyx.cs.du.edu added the pid-list feature.  Charles
       Blake cblake@bbn.com added multi-level sorting, the dirent-style li
       brary, the device name-to-number mmaped database, the approximate binary
       search directly on System.map, and many code and documentation cleanups.
       David Mossberger-Tang wrote the generic BFD support for psupdate.
       Albert Cahalan albert@users.sf.net rewrote ps for full Unix98 and BSD
       support, along with some ugly hacks for obsolete and foreign syntax.

       Please send bug reports to procps@freelists.org.  No subscription is
       required or suggested.

procps-ng                          2020-06-04                             PS(1)
PWD(1)                           User Commands                           PWD(1)

NAME
       pwd - print name of current/working directory

SYNOPSIS
       pwd [OPTION]...

DESCRIPTION
       Print the full filename of the current working directory.

       -L, --logical
              use PWD from environment, even if it contains symlinks

       -P, --physical
              avoid all symlinks

       --help display this help and exit

       --version
              output version information and exit

       If no option is specified, -P is assumed.

       NOTE:  your  shell may have its own version of pwd, which usually super
       sedes the version described here.  Please refer to your shell's documen
       tation for details about the options it supports.

AUTHOR
       Written by Jim Meyering.

REPORTING BUGS
       GNU coreutils online help: <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/>
       Report any translation bugs to <https://translationproject.org/team/>

COPYRIGHT
       Copyright  2020 Free Software Foundation, Inc.  License GPLv3+: GNU GPL
       version 3 or later <https://gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html>.
       This is free software: you are  free  to  change  and  redistribute  it.
       There is NO WARRANTY, to the extent permitted by law.

SEE ALSO
       getcwd(3)

       Full documentation <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/pwd>
       or available locally via: info '(coreutils) pwd invocation'

GNU coreutils 8.32               February 2024                           PWD(1)
LS(1)                            User Commands                            LS(1)

NAME
       ls - list directory contents

SYNOPSIS
       ls [OPTION]... [FILE]...

DESCRIPTION
       List  information  about  the  FILEs (the current directory by default).
       Sort entries alphabetically if none of -cftuvSUX nor  --sort  is  speci
       fied.

       Mandatory arguments to long options are mandatory for short options too.

       -a, --all
              do not ignore entries starting with .

       -A, --almost-all
              do not list implied . and ..

       --author
              with -l, print the author of each file

       -b, --escape
              print C-style escapes for nongraphic characters

       --block-size=SIZE
              with   -l,   scale  sizes  by  SIZE  when  printing  them;  e.g.,
              '--block-size=M'; see SIZE format below

       -B, --ignore-backups
              do not list implied entries ending with ~

       -c     with -lt: sort by, and show, ctime (time of last modification  of
              file  status  information); with -l: show ctime and sort by name;
              otherwise: sort by ctime, newest first

       -C     list entries by columns

       --color[=WHEN]
              colorize the output; WHEN can be 'always' (default  if  omitted),
              'auto', or 'never'; more info below

       -d, --directory
              list directories themselves, not their contents

       -D, --dired
              generate output designed for Emacs' dired mode

       -f     do not sort, enable -aU, disable -ls --color

       -F, --classify
              append indicator (one of */=>@|) to entries

       --file-type
              likewise, except do not append '*'

       --format=WORD
              across  -x,  commas -m, horizontal -x, long -l, single-column -1,
              verbose -l, vertical -C

       --full-time
              like -l --time-style=full-iso

       -g     like -l, but do not list owner

       --group-directories-first
              group directories before files;

              can be augmented with a --sort option, but any use of --sort=none
              (-U) disables grouping

       -G, --no-group
              in a long listing, don't print group names

       -h, --human-readable
              with -l and -s, print sizes like 1K 234M 2G etc.

       --si   likewise, but use powers of 1000 not 1024

       -H, --dereference-command-line
              follow symbolic links listed on the command line

       --dereference-command-line-symlink-to-dir
              follow each command line symbolic link

              that points to a directory

       --hide=PATTERN
              do not list implied entries matching shell PATTERN (overridden by
              -a or -A)

       --hyperlink[=WHEN]
              hyperlink file names; WHEN can be 'always' (default if  omitted),
              'auto', or 'never'

       --indicator-style=WORD
              append  indicator with style WORD to entry names: none (default),
              slash (-p), file-type (--file-type), classify (-F)

       -i, --inode
              print the index number of each file

       -I, --ignore=PATTERN
              do not list implied entries matching shell PATTERN

       -k, --kibibytes
              default to 1024-byte blocks for disk usage; used only with -s and
              per directory totals

       -l     use a long listing format

       -L, --dereference
              when  showing file information for a symbolic link, show informa
              tion for the file the link references rather than  for  the  link
              itself

       -m     fill width with a comma separated list of entries

       -n, --numeric-uid-gid
              like -l, but list numeric user and group IDs

       -N, --literal
              print entry names without quoting

       -o     like -l, but do not list group information

       -p, --indicator-style=slash
              append / indicator to directories

       -q, --hide-control-chars
              print ? instead of nongraphic characters

       --show-control-chars
              show  nongraphic characters as-is (the default, unless program is
              'ls' and output is a terminal)

       -Q, --quote-name
              enclose entry names in double quotes

       --quoting-style=WORD
              use quoting style WORD for entry names: literal,  locale,  shell,
              shell-always, shell-escape, shell-escape-always, c, escape (over
              rides QUOTING_STYLE environment variable)

       -r, --reverse
              reverse order while sorting

       -R, --recursive
              list subdirectories recursively

       -s, --size
              print the allocated size of each file, in blocks

       -S     sort by file size, largest first

       --sort=WORD
              sort by WORD instead of name: none (-U), size  (-S),  time  (-t),
              version (-v), extension (-X)

       --time=WORD
              change the default of using modification times; access time (-u):
              atime, access, use; change time (-c): ctime, status; birth  time:
              birth, creation;

              with  -l,  WORD  determines which time to show; with --sort=time,
              sort by WORD (newest first)

       --time-style=TIME_STYLE
              time/date format with -l; see TIME_STYLE below

       -t     sort by time, newest first; see --time

       -T, --tabsize=COLS
              assume tab stops at each COLS instead of 8

       -u     with -lt: sort by, and show, access time; with  -l:  show  access
              time  and  sort  by  name; otherwise: sort by access time, newest
              first

       -U     do not sort; list entries in directory order

       -v     natural sort of (version) numbers within text

       -w, --width=COLS
              set output width to COLS.  0 means no limit

       -x     list entries by lines instead of by columns

       -X     sort alphabetically by entry extension

       -Z, --context
              print any security context of each file

       -1     list one file per line.  Avoid '\n' with -q or -b

       --help display this help and exit

       --version
              output version information and exit

       The SIZE argument is an integer  and  optional  unit  (example:  10K  is
       10*1024).  Units are K,M,G,T,P,E,Z,Y (powers of 1024) or KB,MB,... (pow
       ers of 1000).  Binary prefixes can be used, too: KiB=K,  MiB=M,  and  so
       on.

       The TIME_STYLE argument can be full-iso, long-iso, iso, locale, or +FOR
       MAT.  FORMAT is interpreted like in date(1).  If FORMAT is  FORMAT1<new
       line>FORMAT2,  then  FORMAT1  applies to non-recent files and FORMAT2 to
       recent files.  TIME_STYLE prefixed with 'posix-' takes effect only  out
       side  the  POSIX  locale.  Also the TIME_STYLE environment variable sets
       the default style to use.

       Using color to distinguish file types is disabled both  by  default  and
       with  --color=never.   With --color=auto, ls emits color codes only when
       standard output is connected to a terminal.  The  LS_COLORS  environment
       variable can change the settings.  Use the dircolors command to set it.

   Exit status:
       0      if OK,

       1      if minor problems (e.g., cannot access subdirectory),

       2      if serious trouble (e.g., cannot access command-line argument).

AUTHOR
       Written by Richard M. Stallman and David MacKenzie.

REPORTING BUGS
       GNU coreutils online help: <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/>
       Report any translation bugs to <https://translationproject.org/team/>

COPYRIGHT
       Copyright  2020 Free Software Foundation, Inc.  License GPLv3+: GNU GPL
       version 3 or later <https://gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html>.
       This is free software: you are  free  to  change  and  redistribute  it.
       There is NO WARRANTY, to the extent permitted by law.

SEE ALSO
       Full documentation <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/ls>
       or available locally via: info '(coreutils) ls invocation'

GNU coreutils 8.32               February 2024                            LS(1)
NETSTAT(8)            Linux System Administrator's Manual            NETSTAT(8)

NAME
       netstat  -  Print network connections, routing tables, interface statis
       tics, masquerade connections, and multicast memberships

SYNOPSIS
       netstat [address_family_options]  [--tcp|-t]  [--udp|-u]  [--udplite|-U]
       [--sctp|-S]   [--raw|-w]   [--l2cap|-2]  [--rfcomm|-f]  [--listening|-l]
       [--all|-a]  [--numeric|-n]  [--numeric-hosts]  [--numeric-ports]  [--nu
       meric-users]  [--symbolic|-N]  [--extend|-e[--extend|-e]]  [--timers|-o]
       [--program|-p] [--verbose|-v] [--continuous|-c] [--wide|-W]

       netstat {--route|-r} [address_family_options] [--extend|-e[--extend|-e]]
       [--verbose|-v] [--numeric|-n] [--numeric-hosts] [--numeric-ports] [--nu
       meric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat {--interfaces|-i} [--all|-a] [--extend|-e[--extend|-e]]  [--ver
       bose|-v]  [--program|-p]  [--numeric|-n]  [--numeric-hosts]  [--numeric-
       ports] [--numeric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat {--groups|-g} [--numeric|-n] [--numeric-hosts] [--numeric-ports]
       [--numeric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat {--masquerade|-M} [--extend|-e] [--numeric|-n] [--numeric-hosts]
       [--numeric-ports] [--numeric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat   {--statistics|-s}   [--tcp|-t]    [--udp|-u]    [--udplite|-U]
       [--sctp|-S] [--raw|-w]

       netstat {--version|-V}

       netstat {--help|-h}

       address_family_options:

       [-4|--inet]                    [-6|--inet6]                    [--proto
       col={inet,inet6,unix,ipx,ax25,netrom,ddp,bluetooth, ... } ]  [--unix|-x]
       [--inet|--ip|--tcpip]  [--ax25]  [--x25]  [--rose] [--ash] [--bluetooth]
       [--ipx] [--netrom] [--ddp|--appletalk] [--econet|--ec]

NOTES
       This program is mostly obsolete.  Replacement for netstat  is  ss.   Re
       placement  for netstat -r is ip route.  Replacement for netstat -i is ip
       -s link.  Replacement for netstat -g is ip maddr.

DESCRIPTION
       Netstat prints information about the Linux  networking  subsystem.   The
       type of information printed is controlled by the first argument, as fol
       lows:

   (none)
       By default, netstat displays a list of open sockets.  If you don't spec
       ify  any address families, then the active sockets of all configured ad
       dress families will be printed.

   --route, -r
       Display the kernel routing tables. See the description in  route(8)  for
       details.  netstat -r and route -e produce the same output.

   --groups, -g
       Display multicast group membership information for IPv4 and IPv6.

   --interfaces, -i
       Display a table of all network interfaces.

   --masquerade, -M
       Display a list of masqueraded connections.

   --statistics, -s
       Display summary statistics for each protocol.

OPTIONS
   --verbose, -v
       Tell  the  user what is going on by being verbose. Especially print some
       useful information about unconfigured address families.

   --wide, -W
       Do not truncate IP addresses by using output as wide as needed. This  is
       optional for now to not break existing scripts.

   --numeric, -n
       Show  numerical  addresses instead of trying to determine symbolic host,
       port or user names.

   --numeric-hosts
       shows numerical host addresses but does not  affect  the  resolution  of
       port or user names.

   --numeric-ports
       shows  numerical port numbers but does not affect the resolution of host
       or user names.

   --numeric-users
       shows numerical user IDs but does not affect the resolution of  host  or
       port names.

   --protocol=family, -A
       Specifies  the  address  families (perhaps better described as low level
       protocols) for which connections are to be shown.   family  is  a  comma
       (',')  separated list of address family keywords like inet, inet6, unix,
       ipx, ax25, netrom, econet, ddp, and bluetooth.  This has the same effect
       as  using the --inet|-4, --inet6|-6, --unix|-x, --ipx, --ax25, --netrom,
       --ddp, and --bluetooth options.

       The address family inet (Iv4) includes raw, udp, udplite and tcp  proto
       col sockets.

       The  address  family  bluetooth (Iv4) includes l2cap and rfcomm protocol
       sockets.

   -c, --continuous
       This will cause netstat to print the selected information  every  second
       continuously.

   -e, --extend
       Display  additional  information.  Use this option twice for maximum de
       tail.

   -o, --timers
       Include information related to networking timers.

   -p, --program
       Show the PID and name of the program to which each socket belongs.

   -l, --listening
       Show only listening sockets.  (These are omitted by default.)

   -a, --all
       Show both listening and non-listening sockets.   With  the  --interfaces
       option, show interfaces that are not up

   -F
       Print routing information from the FIB.  (This is the default.)

   -C
       Print routing information from the route cache.

OUTPUT
   Active Internet connections (TCP, UDP, UDPLite, raw)
   Proto
       The protocol (tcp, udp, udpl, raw) used by the socket.

   Recv-Q
       Established: The count of bytes not copied by the user program connected
       to this socket.  Listening: Since Kernel 2.6.18 this column contains the
       current syn backlog.

   Send-Q
       Established:  The  count  of  bytes not acknowledged by the remote host.
       Listening: Since Kernel 2.6.18 this column contains the maximum size  of
       the syn backlog.

   Local Address
       Address  and  port  number  of  the local end of the socket.  Unless the
       --numeric (-n) option is specified, the socket address  is  resolved  to
       its  canonical  host name (FQDN), and the port number is translated into
       the corresponding service name.

   Foreign Address
       Address and port number of the remote end of the socket.   Analogous  to
       "Local Address".

   State
       The  state of the socket. Since there are no states in raw mode and usu
       ally no states used in UDP and UDPLite, this column may be  left  blank.
       Normally this can be one of several values:

       ESTABLISHED
              The socket has an established connection.

       SYN_SENT
              The socket is actively attempting to establish a connection.

       SYN_RECV
              A connection request has been received from the network.

       FIN_WAIT1
              The socket is closed, and the connection is shutting down.

       FIN_WAIT2
              Connection  is  closed,  and the socket is waiting for a shutdown
              from the remote end.

       TIME_WAIT
              The socket is waiting after close to handle packets still in  the
              network.

       CLOSE  The socket is not being used.

       CLOSE_WAIT
              The remote end has shut down, waiting for the socket to close.

       LAST_ACK
              The  remote  end has shut down, and the socket is closed. Waiting
              for acknowledgement.

       LISTEN The socket is listening for incoming connections.   Such  sockets
              are not included in the output unless you specify the --listening
              (-l) or --all (-a) option.

       CLOSING
              Both sockets are shut down but we still don't have all  our  data
              sent.

       UNKNOWN
              The state of the socket is unknown.

   User
       The username or the user id (UID) of the owner of the socket.

   PID/Program name
       Slash-separated  pair  of  the  process id (PID) and process name of the
       process that owns the socket.  --program causes this column  to  be  in
       cluded.  You will also need superuser privileges to see this information
       on sockets you don't own.  This identification information  is  not  yet
       available for IPX sockets.

   Timer
       (this needs to be written)

   Active UNIX domain Sockets
   Proto
       The protocol (usually unix) used by the socket.

   RefCnt
       The reference count (i.e. attached processes via this socket).

   Flags
       The  flags  displayed is SO_ACCEPTON (displayed as ACC), SO_WAITDATA (W)
       or SO_NOSPACE (N).  SO_ACCECPTON is used on unconnected sockets if their
       corresponding  processes  are  waiting  for a connect request. The other
       flags are not of normal interest.

   Type
       There are several types of socket access:

       SOCK_DGRAM
              The socket is used in Datagram (connectionless) mode.

       SOCK_STREAM
              This is a stream (connection) socket.

       SOCK_RAW
              The socket is used as a raw socket.

       SOCK_RDM
              This one serves reliably-delivered messages.

       SOCK_SEQPACKET
              This is a sequential packet socket.

       SOCK_PACKET
              Raw interface access socket.

       UNKNOWN
              Who ever knows what the future will bring us - just fill in  here
              :-)

   State
       This field will contain one of the following Keywords:

       FREE   The socket is not allocated

       LISTENING
              The  socket  is listening for a connection request.  Such sockets
              are only included in the output if you  specify  the  --listening
              (-l) or --all (-a) option.

       CONNECTING
              The socket is about to establish a connection.

       CONNECTED
              The socket is connected.

       DISCONNECTING
              The socket is disconnecting.

       (empty)
              The socket is not connected to another one.

       UNKNOWN
              This state should never happen.

   PID/Program name
       Process  ID  (PID)  and  process name of the process that has the socket
       open.  More info available in Active Internet connections section  writ
       ten above.

   Path
       This  is  the path name as which the corresponding processes attached to
       the socket.

   Active IPX sockets
       (this needs to be done by somebody who knows it)

   Active NET/ROM sockets
       (this needs to be done by somebody who knows it)

   Active AX.25 sockets
       (this needs to be done by somebody who knows it)

FILES
       /etc/services -- The services translation file

       /proc -- Mount point for the proc filesystem, which gives access to ker
       nel status information via the following files.

       /proc/net/dev -- device information

       /proc/net/raw -- raw socket information

       /proc/net/tcp -- TCP socket information

       /proc/net/udp -- UDP socket information

       /proc/net/udplite -- UDPLite socket information

       /proc/net/igmp -- IGMP multicast information

       /proc/net/unix -- Unix domain socket information

       /proc/net/ipx -- IPX socket information

       /proc/net/ax25 -- AX25 socket information

       /proc/net/appletalk -- DDP (appletalk) socket information

       /proc/net/nr -- NET/ROM socket information

       /proc/net/route -- IP routing information

       /proc/net/ax25_route -- AX25 routing information

       /proc/net/ipx_route -- IPX routing information

       /proc/net/nr_nodes -- NET/ROM nodelist

       /proc/net/nr_neigh -- NET/ROM neighbours

       /proc/net/ip_masquerade -- masqueraded connections

       /sys/kernel/debug/bluetooth/l2cap -- Bluetooth L2CAP information

       /sys/kernel/debug/bluetooth/rfcomm -- Bluetooth serial connections

       /proc/net/snmp -- statistics

SEE ALSO
       route(8), ifconfig(8), iptables(8), proc(5) ss(8) ip(8)

BUGS
       Occasionally strange information may appear if a socket changes as it is
       viewed. This is unlikely to occur.

AUTHORS
       The  netstat   user   interface   was   written   by   Fred   Baumgarten
       <dc6iq@insu1.etec.uni-karlsruhe.de>,  the  man  page  basically  by Matt
       Welsh   <mdw@tc.cornell.edu>.   It   was    updated    by    Alan    Cox
       <Alan.Cox@linux.org>, updated again by Tuan Hoang <tqhoang@bigfoot.com>.
       The man page and the command included in the net-tools  package  is  to
       tally  rewritten  by  Bernd  Eckenfels <ecki@linux.de>.  UDPLite options
       were added by Brian Micek <bmicek@gmail.com>

net-tools                          2014-10-07                        NETSTAT(8)
PS(1)                            User Commands                            PS(1)

NAME
       ps - report a snapshot of the current processes.

SYNOPSIS
       ps [options]

DESCRIPTION
       ps displays information about a selection of the active processes.  If
       you want a repetitive update of the selection and the displayed
       information, use top instead.

       This version of ps accepts several kinds of options:

       1   UNIX options, which may be grouped and must be preceded by a dash.
       2   BSD options, which may be grouped and must not be used with a dash.
       3   GNU long options, which are preceded by two dashes.

       Options of different types may be freely mixed, but conflicts can
       appear.  There are some synonymous options, which are functionally
       identical, due to the many standards and ps implementations that this ps
       is compatible with.

       Note that ps -aux is distinct from ps aux.  The POSIX and UNIX standards
       require that ps -aux print all processes owned by a user named x, as
       well as printing all processes that would be selected by the -a option.
       If the user named x does not exist, this ps may interpret the command as
       ps aux instead and print a warning.  This behavior is intended to aid in
       transitioning old scripts and habits.  It is fragile, subject to change,
       and thus should not be relied upon.

       By default, ps selects all processes with the same effective user ID
       (euid=EUID) as the current user and associated with the same terminal as
       the invoker.  It displays the process ID (pid=PID), the terminal
       associated with the process (tname=TTY), the cumulated CPU time in
       [DD-]hh:mm:ss format (time=TIME), and the executable name (ucmd=CMD).
       Output is unsorted by default.

       The use of BSD-style options will add process state (stat=STAT) to the
       default display and show the command args (args=COMMAND) instead of the
       executable name.  You can override this with the PS_FORMAT environment
       variable.  The use of BSD-style options will also change the process
       selection to include processes on other terminals (TTYs) that are owned
       by you; alternately, this may be described as setting the selection to
       be the set of all processes filtered to exclude processes owned by other
       users or not on a terminal.  These effects are not considered when
       options are described as being "identical" below, so -M will be
       considered identical to Z and so on.

       Except as described below, process selection options are additive.  The
       default selection is discarded, and then the selected processes are
       added to the set of processes to be displayed.  A process will thus be
       shown if it meets any of the given selection criteria.

EXAMPLES
       To see every process on the system using standard syntax:
          ps -e
          ps -ef
          ps -eF
          ps -ely

       To see every process on the system using BSD syntax:
          ps ax
          ps axu

       To print a process tree:
          ps -ejH
          ps axjf

       To get info about threads:
          ps -eLf
          ps axms

       To get security info:
          ps -eo euser,ruser,suser,fuser,f,comm,label
          ps axZ
          ps -eM

       To see every process running as root (real & effective ID) in user
       format:
          ps -U root -u root u

       To see every process with a user-defined format:
          ps -eo pid,tid,class,rtprio,ni,pri,psr,pcpu,stat,wchan:14,comm
          ps axo stat,euid,ruid,tty,tpgid,sess,pgrp,ppid,pid,pcpu,comm
          ps -Ao pid,tt,user,fname,tmout,f,wchan

       Print only the process IDs of syslogd:
          ps -C syslogd -o pid=

       Print only the name of PID 42:
          ps -q 42 -o comm=

SIMPLE PROCESS SELECTION
       a      Lift the BSD-style "only yourself" restriction, which is imposed
              upon the set of all processes when some BSD-style (without "-")
              options are used or when the ps personality setting is BSD-like.
              The set of processes selected in this manner is in addition to
              the set of processes selected by other means.  An alternate
              description is that this option causes ps to list all processes
              with a terminal (tty), or to list all processes when used
              together with the x option.

       -A     Select all processes.  Identical to -e.

       -a     Select all processes except both session leaders (see getsid(2))
              and processes not associated with a terminal.

       -d     Select all processes except session leaders.

       --deselect
              Select all processes except those that fulfill the specified
              conditions (negates the selection).  Identical to -N.

       -e     Select all processes.  Identical to -A.

       g      Really all, even session leaders.  This flag is obsolete and may
              be discontinued in a future release.  It is normally implied by
              the a flag, and is only useful when operating in the sunos4
              personality.

       -N     Select all processes except those that fulfill the specified
              conditions (negates the selection).  Identical to --deselect.

       T      Select all processes associated with this terminal.  Identical to
              the t option without any argument.

       r      Restrict the selection to only running processes.

       x      Lift the BSD-style "must have a tty" restriction, which is
              imposed upon the set of all processes when some BSD-style
              (without "-") options are used or when the ps personality setting
              is BSD-like.  The set of processes selected in this manner is in
              addition to the set of processes selected by other means.  An
              alternate description is that this option causes ps to list all
              processes owned by you (same EUID as ps), or to list all
              processes when used together with the a option.

PROCESS SELECTION BY LIST
       These options accept a single argument in the form of a blank-separated
       or comma-separated list.  They can be used multiple times.  For example:
       ps -p "1 2" -p 3,4

       -123   Identical to --pid 123.

       123    Identical to --pid 123.

       -C cmdlist
              Select by command name.  This selects the processes whose
              executable name is given in cmdlist.  NOTE: The command name is
              not the same as the command line. Previous versions of procps and
              the kernel truncated this command name to 15 characters. This
              limitation is no longer present in both. If you depended on
              matching only 15 characters, you may no longer get a match.

       -G grplist
              Select by real group ID (RGID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose real group name or ID is in the grplist list.
              The real group ID identifies the group of the user who created
              the process, see getgid(2).

       -g grplist
              Select by session OR by effective group name.  Selection by
              session is specified by many standards, but selection by
              effective group is the logical behavior that several other
              operating systems use.  This ps will select by session when the
              list is completely numeric (as sessions are).  Group ID numbers
              will work only when some group names are also specified.  See the
              -s and --group options.

       --Group grplist
              Select by real group ID (RGID) or name.  Identical to -G.

       --group grplist
              Select by effective group ID (EGID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose effective group name or ID is in grplist.  The
              effective group ID describes the group whose file access
              permissions are used by the process (see getegid(2)).  The -g
              option is often an alternative to --group.

       p pidlist
              Select by process ID.  Identical to -p and --pid.

       -p pidlist
              Select by PID.  This selects the processes whose process ID
              numbers appear in pidlist.  Identical to p and --pid.

       --pid pidlist
              Select by process ID.  Identical to -p and p.

       --ppid pidlist
              Select by parent process ID.  This selects the processes with a
              parent process ID in pidlist.  That is, it selects processes that
              are children of those listed in pidlist.

       q pidlist
              Select by process ID (quick mode).  Identical to -q and
              --quick-pid.

       -q pidlist
              Select by PID (quick mode).  This selects the processes whose
              process ID numbers appear in pidlist.  With this option ps reads
              the necessary info only for the pids listed in the pidlist and
              doesn't apply additional filtering rules.  The order of pids is
              unsorted and preserved.  No additional selection options, sorting
              and forest type listings are allowed in this mode.  Identical to
              q and --quick-pid.

       --quick-pid pidlist
              Select by process ID (quick mode).  Identical to -q and q.

       -s sesslist
              Select by session ID.  This selects the processes with a session
              ID specified in sesslist.

       --sid sesslist
              Select by session ID.  Identical to -s.

       t ttylist
              Select by tty.  Nearly identical to -t and --tty, but can also be
              used with an empty ttylist to indicate the terminal associated
              with ps.  Using the T option is considered cleaner than using t
              with an empty ttylist.

       -t ttylist
              Select by tty.  This selects the processes associated with the
              terminals given in ttylist.  Terminals (ttys, or screens for text
              output) can be specified in several forms: /dev/ttyS1, ttyS1, S1.
              A plain "-" may be used to select processes not attached to any
              terminal.

       --tty ttylist
              Select by terminal.  Identical to -t and t.

       U userlist
              Select by effective user ID (EUID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose effective user name or ID is in userlist.  The
              effective user ID describes the user whose file access
              permissions are used by the process (see geteuid(2)).  Identical
              to -u and --user.

       -U userlist
              Select by real user ID (RUID) or name.  It selects the processes
              whose real user name or ID is in the userlist list.  The real
              user ID identifies the user who created the process, see
              getuid(2).

       -u userlist
              Select by effective user ID (EUID) or name.  This selects the
              processes whose effective user name or ID is in userlist.

              The effective user ID describes the user whose file access
              permissions are used by the process (see geteuid(2)).  Identical
              to U and --user.

       --User userlist
              Select by real user ID (RUID) or name.  Identical to -U.

       --user userlist
              Select by effective user ID (EUID) or name.  Identical to -u and
              U.

OUTPUT FORMAT CONTROL
       These options are used to choose the information displayed by ps.  The
       output may differ by personality.

       -c     Show different scheduler information for the -l option.

       --context
              Display security context format (for SELinux).

       -f     Do full-format listing.  This option can be combined with many
              other UNIX-style options to add additional columns.  It also
              causes the command arguments to be printed.  When used with -L,
              the NLWP (number of threads) and LWP (thread ID) columns will be
              added.  See the c option, the format keyword args, and the format
              keyword comm.

       -F     Extra full format.  See the -f option, which -F implies.

       --format format
              user-defined format.  Identical to -o and o.

       j      BSD job control format.

       -j     Jobs format.

       l      Display BSD long format.

       -l     Long format.  The -y option is often useful with this.

       -M     Add a column of security data.  Identical to Z (for SELinux).

       O format
              is preloaded o (overloaded).  The BSD O option can act like -O
              (user-defined output format with some common fields predefined)
              or can be used to specify sort order.  Heuristics are used to
              determine the behavior of this option.  To ensure that the
              desired behavior is obtained (sorting or formatting), specify the
              option in some other way (e.g.  with -O or --sort).  When used as
              a formatting option, it is identical to -O, with the BSD
              personality.

       -O format
              Like -o, but preloaded with some default columns.  Identical to
              -o pid,format,state,tname,time,command or -o pid,format,tname,
              time,cmd, see -o below.

       o format
              Specify user-defined format.  Identical to -o and --format.

       -o format
              User-defined format.  format is a single argument in the form of
              a blank-separated or comma-separated list, which offers a way to
              specify individual output columns.  The recognized keywords are
              described in the STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section below.
              Headers may be renamed (ps -o pid,ruser=RealUser -o comm=Command)
              as desired.  If all column headers are empty (ps -o pid= -o
              comm=) then the header line will not be output.  Column width
              will increase as needed for wide headers; this may be used to
              widen up columns such as WCHAN (ps -o pid,wchan=WIDE-WCHAN-COLUMN
              -o comm).  Explicit width control (ps opid,wchan:42,cmd) is
              offered too.  The behavior of ps -o pid=X,comm=Y varies with
              personality; output may be one column named "X,comm=Y" or two
              columns named "X" and "Y".  Use multiple -o options when in
              doubt.  Use the PS_FORMAT environment variable to specify a
              default as desired; DefSysV and DefBSD are macros that may be
              used to choose the default UNIX or BSD columns.

       s      Display signal format.

       u      Display user-oriented format.

       v      Display virtual memory format.

       X      Register format.

       -y     Do not show flags; show rss in place of addr.  This option can
              only be used with -l.

       Z      Add a column of security data.  Identical to -M (for SELinux).

OUTPUT MODIFIERS
       c      Show the true command name.  This is derived from the name of the
              executable file, rather than from the argv value.  Command
              arguments and any modifications to them are thus not shown.  This
              option effectively turns the args format keyword into the comm
              format keyword; it is useful with the -f format option and with
              the various BSD-style format options, which all normally display
              the command arguments.  See the -f option, the format keyword
              args, and the format keyword comm.

       --cols n
              Set screen width.

       --columns n
              Set screen width.

       --cumulative
              Include some dead child process data (as a sum with the parent).

       e      Show the environment after the command.

       f      ASCII art process hierarchy (forest).

       --forest
              ASCII art process tree.

       h      No header.  (or, one header per screen in the BSD personality).
              The h option is problematic.  Standard BSD ps uses this option to
              print a header on each page of output, but older Linux ps uses
              this option to totally disable the header.  This version of ps
              follows the Linux usage of not printing the header unless the BSD
              personality has been selected, in which case it prints a header
              on each page of output.  Regardless of the current personality,
              you can use the long options --headers and --no-headers to enable
              printing headers each page or disable headers entirely,
              respectively.

       -H     Show process hierarchy (forest).

       --headers
              Repeat header lines, one per page of output.

       k spec Specify sorting order.  Sorting syntax is
              [+|-]key[,[+|-]key[,...]].  Choose a multi-letter key from the
              STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section.  The "+" is optional since
              default direction is increasing numerical or lexicographic order.
              Identical to --sort.

                      Examples:
                      ps jaxkuid,-ppid,+pid
                      ps axk comm o comm,args
                      ps kstart_time -ef

       --lines n
              Set screen height.

       n      Numeric output for WCHAN and USER (including all types of UID and
              GID).

       --no-headers
              Print no header line at all.  --no-heading is an alias for this
              option.

       O order
              Sorting order (overloaded).  The BSD O option can act like -O
              (user-defined output format with some common fields predefined)
              or can be used to specify sort order.  Heuristics are used to
              determine the behavior of this option.  To ensure that the
              desired behavior is obtained (sorting or formatting), specify the
              option in some other way (e.g.  with -O or --sort).

              For sorting, obsolete BSD O option syntax is
              O[+|-]k1[,[+|-]k2[,...]].  It orders the processes listing
              according to the multilevel sort specified by the sequence of
              one-letter short keys k1,k2, ... described in the OBSOLETE SORT
              KEYS section below.  The "+" is currently optional, merely
              re-iterating the default direction on a key, but may help to
              distinguish an O sort from an O format.  The "-" reverses
              direction only on the key it precedes.

       --rows n
              Set screen height.

       S      Sum up some information, such as CPU usage, from dead child
              processes into their parent.  This is useful for examining a
              system where a parent process repeatedly forks off short-lived
              children to do work.

       --sort spec
              Specify sorting order.  Sorting syntax is
              [+|-]key[,[+|-]key[,...]].  Choose a multi-letter key from the
              STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section.  The "+" is optional since
              default direction is increasing numerical or lexicographic order.
              Identical to k.  For example: ps jax --sort=uid,-ppid,+pid

       w      Wide output.  Use this option twice for unlimited width.

       -w     Wide output.  Use this option twice for unlimited width.

       --width n
              Set screen width.

THREAD DISPLAY
       H      Show threads as if they were processes.

       -L     Show threads, possibly with LWP and NLWP columns.

       m      Show threads after processes.

       -m     Show threads after processes.

       -T     Show threads, possibly with SPID column.

OTHER INFORMATION
       --help section
              Print a help message.  The section argument can be one of simple,
              list, output, threads, misc, or all.  The argument can be
              shortened to one of the underlined letters as in: s|l|o|t|m|a.

       --info Print debugging info.

       L      List all format specifiers.

       V      Print the procps-ng version.

       -V     Print the procps-ng version.

       --version
              Print the procps-ng version.

NOTES
       This ps works by reading the virtual files in /proc.  This ps does not
       need to be setuid kmem or have any privileges to run.  Do not give this
       ps any special permissions.

       CPU usage is currently expressed as the percentage of time spent running
       during the entire lifetime of a process.  This is not ideal, and it does
       not conform to the standards that ps otherwise conforms to.  CPU usage
       is unlikely to add up to exactly 100%.

       The SIZE and RSS fields don't count some parts of a process including
       the page tables, kernel stack, struct thread_info, and struct
       task_struct.  This is usually at least 20 KiB of memory that is always
       resident.  SIZE is the virtual size of the process (code+data+stack).

       Processes marked <defunct> are dead processes (so-called "zombies") that
       remain because their parent has not destroyed them properly.  These
       processes will be destroyed by init(8) if the parent process exits.

       If the length of the username is greater than the length of the display
       column, the username will be truncated.  See the -o and -O formatting
       options to customize length.

       Commands options such as ps -aux are not recommended as it is a
       confusion of two different standards.  According to the POSIX and UNIX
       standards, the above command asks to display all processes with a TTY
       (generally the commands users are running) plus all processes owned by a
       user named x.  If that user doesn't exist, then ps will assume you
       really meant ps aux.

PROCESS FLAGS
       The sum of these values is displayed in the "F" column, which is
       provided by the flags output specifier:

               1    forked but didn't exec
               4    used super-user privileges

PROCESS STATE CODES
       Here are the different values that the s, stat and state output
       specifiers (header "STAT" or "S") will display to describe the state of
       a process:

               D    uninterruptible sleep (usually IO)
               I    Idle kernel thread
               R    running or runnable (on run queue)
               S    interruptible sleep (waiting for an event to complete)
               T    stopped by job control signal
               t    stopped by debugger during the tracing
               W    paging (not valid since the 2.6.xx kernel)
               X    dead (should never be seen)
               Z    defunct ("zombie") process, terminated but not reaped by
                    its parent

       For BSD formats and when the stat keyword is used, additional characters
       may be displayed:

               <    high-priority (not nice to other users)
               N    low-priority (nice to other users)
               L    has pages locked into memory (for real-time and custom IO)
               s    is a session leader
               l    is multi-threaded (using CLONE_THREAD, like NPTL pthreads
                    do)
               +    is in the foreground process group

OBSOLETE SORT KEYS
       These keys are used by the BSD O option (when it is used for sorting).
       The GNU --sort option doesn't use these keys, but the specifiers
       described below in the STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS section.  Note that
       the values used in sorting are the internal values ps uses and not the
       "cooked" values used in some of the output format fields (e.g.  sorting
       on tty will sort into device number, not according to the terminal name
       displayed).  Pipe ps output into the sort(1) command if you want to sort
       the cooked values.

       KEY   LONG         DESCRIPTION
       c     cmd          simple name of executable
       C     pcpu         cpu utilization
       f     flags        flags as in long format F field
       g     pgrp         process group ID
       G     tpgid        controlling tty process group ID
       j     cutime       cumulative user time
       J     cstime       cumulative system time
       k     utime        user time
       m     min_flt      number of minor page faults
       M     maj_flt      number of major page faults
       n     cmin_flt     cumulative minor page faults
       N     cmaj_flt     cumulative major page faults
       o     session      session ID
       p     pid          process ID
       P     ppid         parent process ID
       r     rss          resident set size
       R     resident     resident pages
       s     size         memory size in kilobytes
       S     share        amount of shared pages
       t     tty          the device number of the controlling tty
       T     start_time   time process was started
       U     uid          user ID number
       u     user         user name
       v     vsize        total VM size in KiB
       y     priority     kernel scheduling priority

AIX FORMAT DESCRIPTORS
       This ps supports AIX format descriptors, which work somewhat like the
       formatting codes of printf(1) and printf(3).  For example, the normal
       default output can be produced with this: ps -eo "%p %y %x %c".  The
       NORMAL codes are described in the next section.

       CODE   NORMAL   HEADER
       %C     pcpu     %CPU
       %G     group    GROUP
       %P     ppid     PPID
       %U     user     USER
       %a     args     COMMAND
       %c     comm     COMMAND
       %g     rgroup   RGROUP
       %n     nice     NI
       %p     pid      PID
       %r     pgid     PGID
       %t     etime    ELAPSED
       %u     ruser    RUSER
       %x     time     TIME
       %y     tty      TTY
       %z     vsz      VSZ

STANDARD FORMAT SPECIFIERS
       Here are the different keywords that may be used to control the output
       format (e.g., with option -o) or to sort the selected processes with the
       GNU-style --sort option.

       For example: ps -eo pid,user,args --sort user

       This version of ps tries to recognize most of the keywords used in other
       implementations of ps.

       The following user-defined format specifiers may contain spaces: args,
       cmd, comm, command, fname, ucmd, ucomm, lstart, bsdstart, start.

       Some keywords may not be available for sorting.

       CODE        HEADER    DESCRIPTION

       %cpu        %CPU      cpu utilization of the process in "##.#" format.
                             Currently, it is the CPU time used divided by the
                             time the process has been running
                             (cputime/realtime ratio), expressed as a
                             percentage.  It will not add up to 100% unless you
                             are lucky.  (alias pcpu).

       %mem        %MEM      ratio of the process's resident set size  to the
                             physical memory on the machine, expressed as a
                             percentage.  (alias pmem).

       args        COMMAND   command with all its arguments as a string.
                             Modifications to the arguments may be shown.  The
                             output in this column may contain spaces.  A
                             process marked <defunct> is partly dead, waiting
                             to be fully destroyed by its parent.  Sometimes
                             the process args will be unavailable; when this
                             happens, ps will instead print the executable name
                             in brackets.  (alias cmd, command).  See also the
                             comm format keyword, the -f option, and the c
                             option.
                             When specified last, this column will extend to
                             the edge of the display.  If ps can not determine
                             display width, as when output is redirected
                             (piped) into a file or another command, the output
                             width is undefined (it may be 80, unlimited,
                             determined by the TERM variable, and so on).  The
                             COLUMNS environment variable or --cols option may
                             be used to exactly determine the width in this
                             case.  The w or -w option may be also be used to
                             adjust width.

       blocked     BLOCKED   mask of the blocked signals, see signal(7).
                             According to the width of the field, a 32 or
                             64-bit mask in hexadecimal format is displayed.
                             (alias sig_block, sigmask).

       bsdstart    START     time the command started.  If the process was
                             started less than 24 hours ago, the output format
                             is " HH:MM", else it is " Mmm:SS" (where Mmm is
                             the three letters of the month).  See also lstart,
                             start, start_time, and stime.

       bsdtime     TIME      accumulated cpu time, user + system.  The display
                             format is usually "MMM:SS", but can be shifted to
                             the right if the process used more than 999
                             minutes of cpu time.

       c           C         processor utilization.  Currently, this is the
                             integer value of the percent usage over the
                             lifetime of the process.  (see %cpu).

       caught      CAUGHT    mask of the caught signals, see signal(7).
                             According to the width of the field, a 32 or 64
                             bits mask in hexadecimal format is displayed.
                             (alias sig_catch, sigcatch).

       cgname      CGNAME    display name of control groups to which the
                             process belongs.

       cgroup      CGROUP    display control groups to which the process
                             belongs.

       class       CLS       scheduling class of the process.  (alias policy,
                             cls).  Field's possible values are:

                                      -   not reported
                                      TS  SCHED_OTHER
                                      FF  SCHED_FIFO
                                      RR  SCHED_RR
                                      B   SCHED_BATCH
                                      ISO SCHED_ISO
                                      IDL SCHED_IDLE
                                      DLN SCHED_DEADLINE
                                      ?   unknown value

       cls         CLS       scheduling class of the process.  (alias policy,
                             cls).  Field's possible values are:

                                      -   not reported
                                      TS  SCHED_OTHER
                                      FF  SCHED_FIFO
                                      RR  SCHED_RR
                                      B   SCHED_BATCH
                                      ISO SCHED_ISO
                                      IDL SCHED_IDLE
                                      DLN SCHED_DEADLINE
                                      ?   unknown value

       cmd         CMD       see args.  (alias args, command).

       comm        COMMAND   command name (only the executable name).
                             Modifications to the command name will not be
                             shown.  A process marked <defunct> is partly dead,
                             waiting to be fully destroyed by its parent.  The
                             output in this column may contain spaces.  (alias
                             ucmd, ucomm).  See also the args format keyword,
                             the -f option, and the c option.
                             When specified last, this column will extend to
                             the edge of the display.  If ps can not determine
                             display width, as when output is redirected
                             (piped) into a file or another command, the output
                             width is undefined (it may be 80, unlimited,
                             determined by the TERM variable, and so on).  The
                             COLUMNS environment variable or --cols option may
                             be used to exactly determine the width in this
                             case.  The w or -w option may be also be used to
                             adjust width.

       command     COMMAND   See args.  (alias args, command).

       cp          CP        per-mill (tenths of a percent) CPU usage.  (see
                             %cpu).

       cputime     TIME      cumulative CPU time, "[DD-]hh:mm:ss" format.
                             (alias time).

       cputimes    TIME      cumulative CPU time in seconds (alias times).

       drs         DRS       data resident set size, the amount of physical
                             memory devoted to other than executable code.

       egid        EGID      effective group ID number of the process as a
                             decimal integer.  (alias gid).

       egroup      EGROUP    effective group ID of the process.  This will be
                             the textual group ID, if it can be obtained and
                             the field width permits, or a decimal
                             representation otherwise.  (alias group).

       eip         EIP       instruction pointer.

       esp         ESP       stack pointer.

       etime       ELAPSED   elapsed time since the process was started, in the
                             form [[DD-]hh:]mm:ss.

       etimes      ELAPSED   elapsed time since the process was started, in
                             seconds.

       euid        EUID      effective user ID (alias uid).

       euser       EUSER     effective user name.  This will be the textual
                             user ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.
                             The n option can be used to force the decimal
                             representation.  (alias uname, user).

       exe         EXE       path to the executable. Useful if path cannot be
                             printed via cmd, comm or args format options.

       f           F         flags associated with the process, see the PROCESS
                             FLAGS section.  (alias flag, flags).

       fgid        FGID      filesystem access group ID.  (alias fsgid).

       fgroup      FGROUP    filesystem access group ID.  This will be the
                             textual group ID, if it can be obtained and the
                             field width permits, or a decimal representation
                             otherwise.  (alias fsgroup).

       flag        F         see f.  (alias f, flags).

       flags       F         see f.  (alias f, flag).

       fname       COMMAND   first 8 bytes of the base name of the process's
                             executable file.  The output in this column may
                             contain spaces.

       fuid        FUID      filesystem access user ID.  (alias fsuid).

       fuser       FUSER     filesystem access user ID.  This will be the
                             textual user ID, if it can be obtained and the
                             field width permits, or a decimal representation
                             otherwise.

       gid         GID       see egid.  (alias egid).

       group       GROUP     see egroup.  (alias egroup).

       ignored     IGNORED   mask of the ignored signals, see signal(7).
                             According to the width of the field, a 32 or 64
                             bits mask in hexadecimal format is displayed.
                             (alias sig_ignore, sigignore).

       ipcns       IPCNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       label       LABEL     security label, most commonly used for SELinux
                             context data.  This is for the Mandatory Access
                             Control ("MAC") found on high-security systems.

       lstart      STARTED   time the command started.  See also bsdstart,
                             start, start_time, and stime.

       lsession    SESSION   displays the login session identifier of a
                             process, if systemd support has been included.

       luid        LUID      displays Login ID associated with a process.

       lwp         LWP       light weight process (thread) ID of the
                             dispatchable entity (alias spid, tid).  See tid
                             for additional information.

       lxc         LXC       The name of the lxc container within which a task
                             is running.  If a process is not running inside a
                             container, a dash ('-') will be shown.

       machine     MACHINE   displays the machine name for processes assigned
                             to VM or container, if systemd support has been
                             included.

       maj_flt     MAJFLT    The number of major page faults that have occurred
                             with this process.

       min_flt     MINFLT    The number of minor page faults that have occurred
                             with this process.

       mntns       MNTNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       netns       NETNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       ni          NI        nice value.  This ranges from 19 (nicest) to -20
                             (not nice to others), see nice(1).  (alias nice).

       nice        NI        see ni.(alias ni).

       nlwp        NLWP      number of lwps (threads) in the process.  (alias
                             thcount).

       numa        NUMA      The node associated with the most recently used
                             processor.  A -1 means that NUMA information is
                             unavailable.

       nwchan      WCHAN     address of the kernel function where the process
                             is sleeping (use wchan if you want the kernel
                             function name).  Running tasks will display a dash
                             ('-') in this column.

       ouid        OWNER     displays the Unix user identifier of the owner of
                             the session of a process, if systemd support has
                             been included.

       pcpu        %CPU      see %cpu.  (alias %cpu).

       pending     PENDING   mask of the pending signals.  See signal(7).
                             Signals pending on the process are distinct from
                             signals pending on individual threads.  Use the m
                             option or the -m option to see both.  According to
                             the width of the field, a 32 or 64 bits mask in
                             hexadecimal format is displayed.  (alias sig).

       pgid        PGID      process group ID or, equivalently, the process ID
                             of the process group leader.  (alias pgrp).

       pgrp        PGRP      see pgid.  (alias pgid).

       pid         PID       a number representing the process ID (alias tgid).

       pidns       PIDNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       pmem        %MEM      see %mem.  (alias %mem).

       policy      POL       scheduling class of the process.  (alias class,
                             cls).  Possible values are:

                                      -   not reported
                                      TS  SCHED_OTHER
                                      FF  SCHED_FIFO
                                      RR  SCHED_RR
                                      B   SCHED_BATCH
                                      ISO SCHED_ISO
                                      IDL SCHED_IDLE
                                      DLN SCHED_DEADLINE
                                      ?   unknown value

       ppid        PPID      parent process ID.

       pri         PRI       priority of the process.  Higher number means
                             lower priority.

       psr         PSR       processor that process is currently assigned to.

       rgid        RGID      real group ID.

       rgroup      RGROUP    real group name.  This will be the textual group
                             ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.

       rss         RSS       resident set size, the non-swapped physical memory
                             that a task has used (in kilobytes).  (alias
                             rssize, rsz).

       rssize      RSS       see rss.  (alias rss, rsz).

       rsz         RSZ       see rss.  (alias rss, rssize).

       rtprio      RTPRIO    realtime priority.

       ruid        RUID      real user ID.

       ruser       RUSER     real user ID.  This will be the textual user ID,
                             if it can be obtained and the field width permits,
                             or a decimal representation otherwise.

       s           S         minimal state display (one character).  See
                             section PROCESS STATE CODES for the different
                             values.  See also stat if you want additional
                             information displayed.  (alias state).

       sched       SCH       scheduling policy of the process.  The policies
                             SCHED_OTHER (SCHED_NORMAL), SCHED_FIFO, SCHED_RR,
                             SCHED_BATCH, SCHED_ISO, SCHED_IDLE and
                             SCHED_DEADLINE are respectively displayed as 0, 1,
                             2, 3, 4, 5 and 6.

       seat        SEAT      displays the identifier associated with all
                             hardware devices assigned to a specific workplace,
                             if systemd support has been included.

       sess        SESS      session ID or, equivalently, the process ID of the
                             session leader.  (alias session, sid).

       sgi_p       P         processor that the process is currently executing
                             on.  Displays "*" if the process is not currently
                             running or runnable.

       sgid        SGID      saved group ID.  (alias svgid).

       sgroup      SGROUP    saved group name.  This will be the textual group
                             ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.

       sid         SID       see sess.  (alias sess, session).

       sig         PENDING   see pending.  (alias pending, sig_pend).

       sigcatch    CAUGHT    see caught.  (alias caught, sig_catch).

       sigignore   IGNORED   see ignored.  (alias ignored, sig_ignore).

       sigmask     BLOCKED   see blocked.  (alias blocked, sig_block).

       size        SIZE      approximate amount of swap space that would be
                             required if the process were to dirty all writable
                             pages and then be swapped out.  This number is
                             very rough!

       slice       SLICE     displays the slice unit which a process belongs
                             to, if systemd support has been included.

       spid        SPID      see lwp.  (alias lwp, tid).

       stackp      STACKP    address of the bottom (start) of stack for the
                             process.

       start       STARTED   time the command started.  If the process was
                             started less than 24 hours ago, the output format
                             is "HH:MM:SS", else it is "  Mmm dd" (where Mmm is
                             a three-letter month name).  See also lstart,
                             bsdstart, start_time, and stime.

       start_time  START     starting time or date of the process.  Only the
                             year will be displayed if the process was not
                             started the same year ps was invoked, or "MmmDD"
                             if it was not started the same day, or "HH:MM"
                             otherwise.  See also bsdstart, start, lstart, and
                             stime.

       stat        STAT      multi-character process state.  See section
                             PROCESS STATE CODES for the different values
                             meaning.  See also s and state if you just want
                             the first character displayed.

       state       S         see s. (alias s).

       stime       STIME     see start_time. (alias start_time).

       suid        SUID      saved user ID.  (alias svuid).

       supgid      SUPGID    group ids of supplementary groups, if any.  See
                             getgroups(2).

       supgrp      SUPGRP    group names of supplementary groups, if any.  See
                             getgroups(2).

       suser       SUSER     saved user name.  This will be the textual user
                             ID, if it can be obtained and the field width
                             permits, or a decimal representation otherwise.
                             (alias svuser).

       svgid       SVGID     see sgid.  (alias sgid).

       svuid       SVUID     see suid.  (alias suid).

       sz          SZ        size in physical pages of the core image of the
                             process.  This includes text, data, and stack
                             space.  Device mappings are currently excluded;
                             this is subject to change.  See vsz and rss.

       tgid        TGID      a number representing the thread group to which a
                             task belongs (alias pid).  It is the process ID of
                             the thread group leader.

       thcount     THCNT     see nlwp.  (alias nlwp).  number of kernel threads
                             owned by the process.

       tid         TID       the unique number representing a dispatchable
                             entity (alias lwp, spid).  This value may also
                             appear as: a process ID (pid); a process group ID
                             (pgrp); a session ID for the session leader (sid);
                             a thread group ID for the thread group leader
                             (tgid); and a tty process group ID for the process
                             group leader (tpgid).

       time        TIME      cumulative CPU time, "[DD-]HH:MM:SS" format.
                             (alias cputime).

       times       TIME      cumulative CPU time in seconds (alias cputimes).

       tname       TTY       controlling tty (terminal).  (alias tt, tty).

       tpgid       TPGID     ID of the foreground process group on the tty
                             (terminal) that the process is connected to, or -1
                             if the process is not connected to a tty.

       trs         TRS       text resident set size, the amount of physical
                             memory devoted to executable code.

       tt          TT        controlling tty (terminal).  (alias tname, tty).

       tty         TT        controlling tty (terminal).  (alias tname, tt).

       ucmd        CMD       see comm.  (alias comm, ucomm).

       ucomm       COMMAND   see comm.  (alias comm, ucmd).

       uid         UID       see euid.  (alias euid).

       uname       USER      see euser.  (alias euser, user).

       unit        UNIT      displays unit which a process belongs to, if
                             systemd support has been included.

       user        USER      see euser.  (alias euser, uname).

       userns      USERNS    Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       utsns       UTSNS     Unique inode number describing the namespace the
                             process belongs to.  See namespaces(7).

       uunit       UUNIT     displays user unit which a process belongs to, if
                             systemd support has been included.

       vsize       VSZ       see vsz.  (alias vsz).

       vsz         VSZ       virtual memory size of the process in KiB
                             (1024-byte units).  Device mappings are currently
                             excluded; this is subject to change.  (alias
                             vsize).

       wchan       WCHAN     name of the kernel function in which the process
                             is sleeping, a "-" if the process is running, or a
                             "*" if the process is multi-threaded and ps is not
                             displaying threads.

ENVIRONMENT VARIABLES
       The following environment variables could affect ps:

       COLUMNS
          Override default display width.

       LINES
          Override default display height.

       PS_PERSONALITY
          Set to one of posix, old, linux, bsd, sun, digital... (see section
          PERSONALITY below).

       CMD_ENV
          Set to one of posix, old, linux, bsd, sun, digital... (see section
          PERSONALITY below).

       I_WANT_A_BROKEN_PS
          Force obsolete command line interpretation.

       LC_TIME
          Date format.

       PS_COLORS
          Not currently supported.

       PS_FORMAT
          Default output format override.  You may set this to a format string
          of the type used for the -o option.  The DefSysV and DefBSD values
          are particularly useful.

       POSIXLY_CORRECT
          Don't find excuses to ignore bad "features".

       POSIX2
          When set to "on", acts as POSIXLY_CORRECT.

       UNIX95
          Don't find excuses to ignore bad "features".

       _XPG
          Cancel CMD_ENV=irix non-standard behavior.

       In general, it is a bad idea to set these variables.  The one exception
       is CMD_ENV or PS_PERSONALITY, which could be set to Linux for normal
       systems.  Without that setting, ps follows the useless and bad parts of
       the Unix98 standard.

PERSONALITY
       390        like the OS/390 OpenEdition ps
       aix        like AIX ps
       bsd        like FreeBSD ps (totally non-standard)
       compaq     like Digital Unix ps
       debian     like the old Debian ps
       digital    like Tru64 (was Digital Unix, was OSF/1) ps
       gnu        like the old Debian ps
       hp         like HP-UX ps
       hpux       like HP-UX ps
       irix       like Irix ps
       linux      ***** recommended *****
       old        like the original Linux ps (totally non-standard)
       os390      like OS/390 Open Edition ps
       posix      standard
       s390       like OS/390 Open Edition ps
       sco        like SCO ps
       sgi        like Irix ps
       solaris2   like Solaris 2+ (SunOS 5) ps
       sunos4     like SunOS 4 (Solaris 1) ps (totally non-standard)
       svr4       standard
       sysv       standard
       tru64      like Tru64 (was Digital Unix, was OSF/1) ps
       unix       standard
       unix95     standard

       unix98     standard

SEE ALSO
       pgrep(1), pstree(1), top(1), proc(5).

STANDARDS
       This ps conforms to:

       1   Version 2 of the Single Unix Specification
       2   The Open Group Technical Standard Base Specifications, Issue 6
       3   IEEE Std 1003.1, 2004 Edition
       4   X/Open System Interfaces Extension [UP XSI]
       5   ISO/IEC 9945:2003

AUTHOR
       ps was originally written by Branko Lankester lankeste@fwi.uva.nl.
       Michael K. Johnson johnsonm@redhat.com re-wrote it significantly to
       use the proc filesystem, changing a few things in the process.  Michael
       Shields mjshield@nyx.cs.du.edu added the pid-list feature.  Charles
       Blake cblake@bbn.com added multi-level sorting, the dirent-style li
       brary, the device name-to-number mmaped database, the approximate binary
       search directly on System.map, and many code and documentation cleanups.
       David Mossberger-Tang wrote the generic BFD support for psupdate.
       Albert Cahalan albert@users.sf.net rewrote ps for full Unix98 and BSD
       support, along with some ugly hacks for obsolete and foreign syntax.

       Please send bug reports to procps@freelists.org.  No subscription is
       required or suggested.

procps-ng                          2020-06-04                             PS(1)
PWD(1)                           User Commands                           PWD(1)

NAME
       pwd - print name of current/working directory

SYNOPSIS
       pwd [OPTION]...

DESCRIPTION
       Print the full filename of the current working directory.

       -L, --logical
              use PWD from environment, even if it contains symlinks

       -P, --physical
              avoid all symlinks

       --help display this help and exit

       --version
              output version information and exit

       If no option is specified, -P is assumed.

       NOTE:  your  shell may have its own version of pwd, which usually super
       sedes the version described here.  Please refer to your shell's documen
       tation for details about the options it supports.

AUTHOR
       Written by Jim Meyering.

REPORTING BUGS
       GNU coreutils online help: <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/>
       Report any translation bugs to <https://translationproject.org/team/>

COPYRIGHT
       Copyright  2020 Free Software Foundation, Inc.  License GPLv3+: GNU GPL
       version 3 or later <https://gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html>.
       This is free software: you are  free  to  change  and  redistribute  it.
       There is NO WARRANTY, to the extent permitted by law.

SEE ALSO
       getcwd(3)

       Full documentation <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/pwd>
       or available locally via: info '(coreutils) pwd invocation'

GNU coreutils 8.32               February 2024                           PWD(1)
LS(1)                            User Commands                            LS(1)

NAME
       ls - list directory contents

SYNOPSIS
       ls [OPTION]... [FILE]...

DESCRIPTION
       List  information  about  the  FILEs (the current directory by default).
       Sort entries alphabetically if none of -cftuvSUX nor  --sort  is  speci
       fied.

       Mandatory arguments to long options are mandatory for short options too.

       -a, --all
              do not ignore entries starting with .

       -A, --almost-all
              do not list implied . and ..

       --author
              with -l, print the author of each file

       -b, --escape
              print C-style escapes for nongraphic characters

       --block-size=SIZE
              with   -l,   scale  sizes  by  SIZE  when  printing  them;  e.g.,
              '--block-size=M'; see SIZE format below

       -B, --ignore-backups
              do not list implied entries ending with ~

       -c     with -lt: sort by, and show, ctime (time of last modification  of
              file  status  information); with -l: show ctime and sort by name;
              otherwise: sort by ctime, newest first

       -C     list entries by columns

       --color[=WHEN]
              colorize the output; WHEN can be 'always' (default  if  omitted),
              'auto', or 'never'; more info below

       -d, --directory
              list directories themselves, not their contents

       -D, --dired
              generate output designed for Emacs' dired mode

       -f     do not sort, enable -aU, disable -ls --color

       -F, --classify
              append indicator (one of */=>@|) to entries

       --file-type
              likewise, except do not append '*'

       --format=WORD
              across  -x,  commas -m, horizontal -x, long -l, single-column -1,
              verbose -l, vertical -C

       --full-time
              like -l --time-style=full-iso

       -g     like -l, but do not list owner

       --group-directories-first
              group directories before files;

              can be augmented with a --sort option, but any use of --sort=none
              (-U) disables grouping

       -G, --no-group
              in a long listing, don't print group names

       -h, --human-readable
              with -l and -s, print sizes like 1K 234M 2G etc.

       --si   likewise, but use powers of 1000 not 1024

       -H, --dereference-command-line
              follow symbolic links listed on the command line

       --dereference-command-line-symlink-to-dir
              follow each command line symbolic link

              that points to a directory

       --hide=PATTERN
              do not list implied entries matching shell PATTERN (overridden by
              -a or -A)

       --hyperlink[=WHEN]
              hyperlink file names; WHEN can be 'always' (default if  omitted),
              'auto', or 'never'

       --indicator-style=WORD
              append  indicator with style WORD to entry names: none (default),
              slash (-p), file-type (--file-type), classify (-F)

       -i, --inode
              print the index number of each file

       -I, --ignore=PATTERN
              do not list implied entries matching shell PATTERN

       -k, --kibibytes
              default to 1024-byte blocks for disk usage; used only with -s and
              per directory totals

       -l     use a long listing format

       -L, --dereference
              when  showing file information for a symbolic link, show informa
              tion for the file the link references rather than  for  the  link
              itself

       -m     fill width with a comma separated list of entries

       -n, --numeric-uid-gid
              like -l, but list numeric user and group IDs

       -N, --literal
              print entry names without quoting

       -o     like -l, but do not list group information

       -p, --indicator-style=slash
              append / indicator to directories

       -q, --hide-control-chars
              print ? instead of nongraphic characters

       --show-control-chars
              show  nongraphic characters as-is (the default, unless program is
              'ls' and output is a terminal)

       -Q, --quote-name
              enclose entry names in double quotes

       --quoting-style=WORD
              use quoting style WORD for entry names: literal,  locale,  shell,
              shell-always, shell-escape, shell-escape-always, c, escape (over
              rides QUOTING_STYLE environment variable)

       -r, --reverse
              reverse order while sorting

       -R, --recursive
              list subdirectories recursively

       -s, --size
              print the allocated size of each file, in blocks

       -S     sort by file size, largest first

       --sort=WORD
              sort by WORD instead of name: none (-U), size  (-S),  time  (-t),
              version (-v), extension (-X)

       --time=WORD
              change the default of using modification times; access time (-u):
              atime, access, use; change time (-c): ctime, status; birth  time:
              birth, creation;

              with  -l,  WORD  determines which time to show; with --sort=time,
              sort by WORD (newest first)

       --time-style=TIME_STYLE
              time/date format with -l; see TIME_STYLE below

       -t     sort by time, newest first; see --time

       -T, --tabsize=COLS
              assume tab stops at each COLS instead of 8

       -u     with -lt: sort by, and show, access time; with  -l:  show  access
              time  and  sort  by  name; otherwise: sort by access time, newest
              first

       -U     do not sort; list entries in directory order

       -v     natural sort of (version) numbers within text

       -w, --width=COLS
              set output width to COLS.  0 means no limit

       -x     list entries by lines instead of by columns

       -X     sort alphabetically by entry extension

       -Z, --context
              print any security context of each file

       -1     list one file per line.  Avoid '\n' with -q or -b

       --help display this help and exit

       --version
              output version information and exit

       The SIZE argument is an integer  and  optional  unit  (example:  10K  is
       10*1024).  Units are K,M,G,T,P,E,Z,Y (powers of 1024) or KB,MB,... (pow
       ers of 1000).  Binary prefixes can be used, too: KiB=K,  MiB=M,  and  so
       on.

       The TIME_STYLE argument can be full-iso, long-iso, iso, locale, or +FOR
       MAT.  FORMAT is interpreted like in date(1).  If FORMAT is  FORMAT1<new
       line>FORMAT2,  then  FORMAT1  applies to non-recent files and FORMAT2 to
       recent files.  TIME_STYLE prefixed with 'posix-' takes effect only  out
       side  the  POSIX  locale.  Also the TIME_STYLE environment variable sets
       the default style to use.

       Using color to distinguish file types is disabled both  by  default  and
       with  --color=never.   With --color=auto, ls emits color codes only when
       standard output is connected to a terminal.  The  LS_COLORS  environment
       variable can change the settings.  Use the dircolors command to set it.

   Exit status:
       0      if OK,

       1      if minor problems (e.g., cannot access subdirectory),

       2      if serious trouble (e.g., cannot access command-line argument).

AUTHOR
       Written by Richard M. Stallman and David MacKenzie.

REPORTING BUGS
       GNU coreutils online help: <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/>
       Report any translation bugs to <https://translationproject.org/team/>

COPYRIGHT
       Copyright  2020 Free Software Foundation, Inc.  License GPLv3+: GNU GPL
       version 3 or later <https://gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html>.
       This is free software: you are  free  to  change  and  redistribute  it.
       There is NO WARRANTY, to the extent permitted by law.

SEE ALSO
       Full documentation <https://www.gnu.org/software/coreutils/ls>
       or available locally via: info '(coreutils) ls invocation'

GNU coreutils 8.32               February 2024                            LS(1)
NETSTAT(8)            Linux System Administrator's Manual            NETSTAT(8)

NAME
       netstat  -  Print network connections, routing tables, interface statis
       tics, masquerade connections, and multicast memberships

SYNOPSIS
       netstat [address_family_options]  [--tcp|-t]  [--udp|-u]  [--udplite|-U]
       [--sctp|-S]   [--raw|-w]   [--l2cap|-2]  [--rfcomm|-f]  [--listening|-l]
       [--all|-a]  [--numeric|-n]  [--numeric-hosts]  [--numeric-ports]  [--nu
       meric-users]  [--symbolic|-N]  [--extend|-e[--extend|-e]]  [--timers|-o]
       [--program|-p] [--verbose|-v] [--continuous|-c] [--wide|-W]

       netstat {--route|-r} [address_family_options] [--extend|-e[--extend|-e]]
       [--verbose|-v] [--numeric|-n] [--numeric-hosts] [--numeric-ports] [--nu
       meric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat {--interfaces|-i} [--all|-a] [--extend|-e[--extend|-e]]  [--ver
       bose|-v]  [--program|-p]  [--numeric|-n]  [--numeric-hosts]  [--numeric-
       ports] [--numeric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat {--groups|-g} [--numeric|-n] [--numeric-hosts] [--numeric-ports]
       [--numeric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat {--masquerade|-M} [--extend|-e] [--numeric|-n] [--numeric-hosts]
       [--numeric-ports] [--numeric-users] [--continuous|-c]

       netstat   {--statistics|-s}   [--tcp|-t]    [--udp|-u]    [--udplite|-U]
       [--sctp|-S] [--raw|-w]

       netstat {--version|-V}

       netstat {--help|-h}

       address_family_options:

       [-4|--inet]                    [-6|--inet6]                    [--proto
       col={inet,inet6,unix,ipx,ax25,netrom,ddp,bluetooth, ... } ]  [--unix|-x]
       [--inet|--ip|--tcpip]  [--ax25]  [--x25]  [--rose] [--ash] [--bluetooth]
       [--ipx] [--netrom] [--ddp|--appletalk] [--econet|--ec]

NOTES
       This program is mostly obsolete.  Replacement for netstat  is  ss.   Re
       placement  for netstat -r is ip route.  Replacement for netstat -i is ip
       -s link.  Replacement for netstat -g is ip maddr.

DESCRIPTION
       Netstat prints information about the Linux  networking  subsystem.   The
       type of information printed is controlled by the first argument, as fol
       lows:

   (none)
       By default, netstat displays a list of open sockets.  If you don't spec
       ify  any address families, then the active sockets of all configured ad
       dress families will be printed.

   --route, -r
       Display the kernel routing tables. See the description in  route(8)  for
       details.  netstat -r and route -e produce the same output.

   --groups, -g
       Display multicast group membership information for IPv4 and IPv6.

   --interfaces, -i
       Display a table of all network interfaces.

   --masquerade, -M
       Display a list of masqueraded connections.

   --statistics, -s
       Display summary statistics for each protocol.

OPTIONS
   --verbose, -v
       Tell  the  user what is going on by being verbose. Especially print some
       useful information about unconfigured address families.

   --wide, -W
       Do not truncate IP addresses by using output as wide as needed. This  is
       optional for now to not break existing scripts.

   --numeric, -n
       Show  numerical  addresses instead of trying to determine symbolic host,
       port or user names.

   --numeric-hosts
       shows numerical host addresses but does not  affect  the  resolution  of
       port or user names.

   --numeric-ports
       shows  numerical port numbers but does not affect the resolution of host
       or user names.

   --numeric-users
       shows numerical user IDs but does not affect the resolution of  host  or
       port names.

   --protocol=family, -A
       Specifies  the  address  families (perhaps better described as low level
       protocols) for which connections are to be shown.   family  is  a  comma
       (',')  separated list of address family keywords like inet, inet6, unix,
       ipx, ax25, netrom, econet, ddp, and bluetooth.  This has the same effect
       as  using the --inet|-4, --inet6|-6, --unix|-x, --ipx, --ax25, --netrom,
       --ddp, and --bluetooth options.

       The address family inet (Iv4) includes raw, udp, udplite and tcp  proto
       col sockets.

       The  address  family  bluetooth (Iv4) includes l2cap and rfcomm protocol
       sockets.

   -c, --continuous
       This will cause netstat to print the selected information  every  second
       continuously.

   -e, --extend
       Display  additional  information.  Use this option twice for maximum de
       tail.

   -o, --timers
       Include information related to networking timers.

   -p, --program
       Show the PID and name of the program to which each socket belongs.

   -l, --listening
       Show only listening sockets.  (These are omitted by default.)

   -a, --all
       Show both listening and non-listening sockets.   With  the  --interfaces
       option, show interfaces that are not up

   -F
       Print routing information from the FIB.  (This is the default.)

   -C
       Print routing information from the route cache.

OUTPUT
   Active Internet connections (TCP, UDP, UDPLite, raw)
   Proto
       The protocol (tcp, udp, udpl, raw) used by the socket.

   Recv-Q
       Established: The count of bytes not copied by the user program connected
       to this socket.  Listening: Since Kernel 2.6.18 this column contains the
       current syn backlog.

   Send-Q
       Established:  The  count  of  bytes not acknowledged by the remote host.
       Listening: Since Kernel 2.6.18 this column contains the maximum size  of
       the syn backlog.

   Local Address
       Address  and  port  number  of  the local end of the socket.  Unless the
       --numeric (-n) option is specified, the socket address  is  resolved  to
       its  canonical  host name (FQDN), and the port number is translated into
       the corresponding service name.

   Foreign Address
       Address and port number of the remote end of the socket.   Analogous  to
       "Local Address".

   State
       The  state of the socket. Since there are no states in raw mode and usu
       ally no states used in UDP and UDPLite, this column may be  left  blank.
       Normally this can be one of several values:

       ESTABLISHED
              The socket has an established connection.

       SYN_SENT
              The socket is actively attempting to establish a connection.

       SYN_RECV
              A connection request has been received from the network.

       FIN_WAIT1
              The socket is closed, and the connection is shutting down.

       FIN_WAIT2
              Connection  is  closed,  and the socket is waiting for a shutdown
              from the remote end.

       TIME_WAIT
              The socket is waiting after close to handle packets still in  the
              network.

       CLOSE  The socket is not being used.

       CLOSE_WAIT
              The remote end has shut down, waiting for the socket to close.

       LAST_ACK
              The  remote  end has shut down, and the socket is closed. Waiting
              for acknowledgement.

       LISTEN The socket is listening for incoming connections.   Such  sockets
              are not included in the output unless you specify the --listening
              (-l) or --all (-a) option.

       CLOSING
              Both sockets are shut down but we still don't have all  our  data
              sent.

       UNKNOWN
              The state of the socket is unknown.

   User
       The username or the user id (UID) of the owner of the socket.

   PID/Program name
       Slash-separated  pair  of  the  process id (PID) and process name of the
       process that owns the socket.  --program causes this column  to  be  in
       cluded.  You will also need superuser privileges to see this information
       on sockets you don't own.  This identification information  is  not  yet
       available for IPX sockets.

   Timer
       (this needs to be written)

   Active UNIX domain Sockets
   Proto
       The protocol (usually unix) used by the socket.

   RefCnt
       The reference count (i.e. attached processes via this socket).

   Flags
       The  flags  displayed is SO_ACCEPTON (displayed as ACC), SO_WAITDATA (W)
       or SO_NOSPACE (N).  SO_ACCECPTON is used on unconnected sockets if their
       corresponding  processes  are  waiting  for a connect request. The other
       flags are not of normal interest.

   Type
       There are several types of socket access:

       SOCK_DGRAM
              The socket is used in Datagram (connectionless) mode.

       SOCK_STREAM
              This is a stream (connection) socket.

       SOCK_RAW
              The socket is used as a raw socket.

       SOCK_RDM
              This one serves reliably-delivered messages.

       SOCK_SEQPACKET
              This is a sequential packet socket.

       SOCK_PACKET
              Raw interface access socket.

       UNKNOWN
              Who ever knows what the future will bring us - just fill in  here
              :-)

   State
       This field will contain one of the following Keywords:

       FREE   The socket is not allocated

       LISTENING
              The  socket  is listening for a connection request.  Such sockets
              are only included in the output if you  specify  the  --listening
              (-l) or --all (-a) option.

       CONNECTING
              The socket is about to establish a connection.

       CONNECTED
              The socket is connected.

       DISCONNECTING
              The socket is disconnecting.

       (empty)
              The socket is not connected to another one.

       UNKNOWN
              This state should never happen.

   PID/Program name
       Process  ID  (PID)  and  process name of the process that has the socket
       open.  More info available in Active Internet connections section  writ
       ten above.

   Path
       This  is  the path name as which the corresponding processes attached to
       the socket.

   Active IPX sockets
       (this needs to be done by somebody who knows it)

   Active NET/ROM sockets
       (this needs to be done by somebody who knows it)

   Active AX.25 sockets
       (this needs to be done by somebody who knows it)

FILES
       /etc/services -- The services translation file

       /proc -- Mount point for the proc filesystem, which gives access to ker
       nel status information via the following files.

       /proc/net/dev -- device information

       /proc/net/raw -- raw socket information

       /proc/net/tcp -- TCP socket information

       /proc/net/udp -- UDP socket information

       /proc/net/udplite -- UDPLite socket information

       /proc/net/igmp -- IGMP multicast information

       /proc/net/unix -- Unix domain socket information

       /proc/net/ipx -- IPX socket information

       /proc/net/ax25 -- AX25 socket information

       /proc/net/appletalk -- DDP (appletalk) socket information

       /proc/net/nr -- NET/ROM socket information

       /proc/net/route -- IP routing information

       /proc/net/ax25_route -- AX25 routing information

       /proc/net/ipx_route -- IPX routing information

       /proc/net/nr_nodes -- NET/ROM nodelist

       /proc/net/nr_neigh -- NET/ROM neighbours

       /proc/net/ip_masquerade -- masqueraded connections

       /sys/kernel/debug/bluetooth/l2cap -- Bluetooth L2CAP information

       /sys/kernel/debug/bluetooth/rfcomm -- Bluetooth serial connections

       /proc/net/snmp -- statistics

SEE ALSO
       route(8), ifconfig(8), iptables(8), proc(5) ss(8) ip(8)

BUGS
       Occasionally strange information may appear if a socket changes as it is
       viewed. This is unlikely to occur.

AUTHORS
       The  netstat   user   interface   was   written   by   Fred   Baumgarten
       <dc6iq@insu1.etec.uni-karlsruhe.de>,  the  man  page  basically  by Matt
       Welsh   <mdw@tc.cornell.edu>.   It   was    updated    by    Alan    Cox
       <Alan.Cox@linux.org>, updated again by Tuan Hoang <tqhoang@bigfoot.com>.
       The man page and the command included in the net-tools  package  is  to
       tally  rewritten  by  Bernd  Eckenfels <ecki@linux.de>.  UDPLite options
       were added by Brian Micek <bmicek@gmail.com>

net-tools                          2014-10-07                        NETSTAT(8)
